c-----In his speech, Mikko Hypponen pointed out how many types of online attackers?
A. 2 types
B. 4 types
C. 3 types
D. 5 types


b-----Freedom of Expression is not recognized as a fundamental human right in human rights declaration of 1948 by The United Nations.
A. True
B. False


b-----Sedition is a representation of freedom of expression and it is legal.
A. True
B. False


a-----Barry Schwartz convinced that the more choices people have, the more freedom they have, and the more freedom they have, the more welfare they have.
A. True
B. False


a-----In the online attackers' portrait by Mikko, almost of online attackers are poor.
A. False
B. True


b-----The freedom of expression is guaranteed in dictatorships and totalitarian regimes.
A. True
B. False


b-----Hacktivists likes Anonymous group doing the hacking activities for laughs.
A. True
B. False


a-----Whistle blowing draws attention toward the act which poses threat to common interests such as .....
 A. Neglecting, violating laws
 B. Neglecting, violating moral values
 C. Abusing or doing harm from employers
 D. Abusing or doing harm from the whistle blower

A. A, B and C
B. B, D and A
C. B, C and D
D. A, C and D


d-----Which is the top secret information that Snowden leaked out?
A. The global surveillance programs leading by China and Russia governments.
B. The global safety programs leading by US and Ukraine governments.
C. The local surveillance programs leading by the cooperation of US and China governments.
D. The global surveillance programs leading by US and UK governments


a-----A gift may be considered a bribe if the gift is not made public.
A. True
B. False


a-----'Humaneness' is a political principle which is the main concept of operating a nation, connecting the world, reflecting the ideology of the democracy.
A. False
B. True


b-----What is PRISM?
A. Code name of Microsoft's window products
B. Code name of a surveillance program by NSA
C. Code name of a super clever program
D. Code name of Program Request Investigation for Security Management


c-----In his self-example, Barry Schwartz wanted to buy a new jean that is ....
A. a slim fit
B. an easy fit
C. None of the others
D. a button fly
E. a zipper fly
F. a relaxed fit


e-----In 1981, Elk Cloner was created by a fifteen-year old high school student, Richard Skrenta, holding responsible for the first large-scale computer virus outbreak in history. Which is the targeted system of Elk Cloner?
A. SCADA system
B. IBM PC
C. TENEX PC
D. BSD Unix
E. Apple II


a-----Which is implied by Dr. Sandel in two different cases?
A. Utilitarian is not the only approach people follow
B. Killing 1 person is worse than killing 5
C. There is only one way to make a decision by relying on utility
D. Killing 1 person for saving five people is a good choice


d-----Technique used in manufacturing a product is categorized into a ....
A. Patent
B. Trademark
C. Copyright
D. Trade secret


a-----Consequentialist ......
A. locates morality in the results from the act
B. locates morality in certain duties and rights
C. locates morality in the person who do the act
D. locates morality in the quality of the act


b-----To become a junzi-a man or "superior man" - a gentleman or a sage. in Confucianism, kindness. sobriety, righteousness, wisdom and trustworthiness are given to human-being with one-self to self-improve.
A. False
B. True


c-----In justice approach. an ethical action is ....
A. certain general conditions that are...equally to everyone's advantage
B. certain ideals toward which we should strive
C. A fair action
D. an action respects the moral rights of everyone
E. that provide the greatest balance of good over evil


d-----Which of the following is NOT one of common issues that can create friction between employers and IT workers?
A. Bribery
B. Providing False Information
C. Whistle-blowing
D. Provide too many options in the Job Interview
E. Fraud
F. Breach of Contract


b-----In the case of cannibal in Vietnam, the man who was arrested and punished in Lang Son is ___
A. A weak man
B. A mental illness man
C. A clever man
D. A strong man


d-----What will give you the right to exclude others from making your product?
A. Trade secret
B. Trademark
C. Copyright
D. Patent


b-----By introducing the four stories of Trolley car case and doctor case, Dr Sandel separated four ways to evaluate ethical aspects of an action.
A. True
B. False


a-----In his hackers' profiles, Misha Glenny found most of the hackers do not have which of the following?
A. Demonstration of any real social skills in the outside world
B. All of the others
C. Demonstration of Advanced ability in maths and sciences


a-----In rights approach, an ethical action is ___
A. an action respects the moral rights of everyone
B. certain ideals toward which we should strive
C. that provide the greatest balance of good over evil
D. A fair action
E. certain general conditions that are...equally to everyone's advantage


f-----In his speech, Mikko concluded these facts:
1. Criminals attack for an opinion
2. Hacktivists attack for protests
3. Nation states attack for protecting us
Which are wrong?
A. 1
B. 2
C. 2 and 3
D. 3
E. 1 and 2
F. 1 and 3


b-----Julian Assange, the founder of wikileaks. said that he and his organization didn't related to Snowden.
A. True
B. False


b-----In Misha Glenny speech. a website which became a sort of supermarket for cybercriminals is ___
A. Cards of Planet
B. CarderPlanet
C. PlanetCarder
D. Planet of Cards


b-----In Misha Glenny speech titled "Hire the hackers", he stated the facts that every companies in the world have been hacked even the cybersecurity services providers.
A. False
B. True


c-----In Glenn Greenwald's speech, United States and its partners has converted ____ once heralded as ___ of liberation and democratization.
A. The internet. best known tool
B. The intranet, best known tool
C. The internet, unprecedented tool
D. The intranet, unprecedented tool


d-----In utilitarian approach, an ethical action is __
A. an action respects the moral rights of everyone
B. certain ideals toward which we should strive
C. A fair action
D. that provide the greatest balance of good over evil
E. certain general conditions that are...equally to everyone's advantage


c-----What is the exclusive right to print, publish, record, etc. of an author on his original works?
A. Trademark
B. Trade secret
C. Copyright
D. Patent


c-----What is the first step to approach with ethical issues and also the most important task is ___
A. Learning the reasons
B. Learning by examples
C. Learning the facts
D. Learning the conventions


c-----The concept of Humaneness in Confucianism expressed by relationships of ___
A. Human-being with other human beings in society
B. Human-being with one-self
C. Both of the others


b-----In his speech. Glenn gave a shamed example of Eric Schmith behaviors that he ordered his employees at Google to cease speaking with the online Internet magazine Dot NET.
A. False
B. True


a-----In his self-example, Barry Schwartz spent an hour trying on all jeans available, and he had a better choice than before with the best-fitting jeans and he felt better.
A. False
B. True


d-----A symbol. word or words representing a company is considered as a __
A. Copyright
B. Trade secret
C. Patent
D. Trademark


a-----In Misha Glenny speech. a little research unit in Turin, Italy performed a research called "Hackers Profiling Project" investigating about ____ of the hackers
A. The characteristics, the abilities and the socialization
B. The phenomenon, the characteristics and the socialization
C. The phenomenon, the abilities and the socialization
D. The characteristics, the abilities and the phenomenon


d-----What is the way STUXNET virus worked?
1. Search
2. Update
3. Compromise
4. Infection
5. Deceive and Destroy
6. Control

A. 4->5->6->2->3->1
B. 1->2->3->4->5->6
C. 6->2->3->4->5->1
D. 4->1->2->3->6->5
E. 2->3->4->5->6->1
F. 2->4->5->1->3->6


c-----Who is a whistle-blower?
A. A person likes to work with media and gives false information about his organization
B. A person wants to increase the market shares of his organization by giving false information
C. A person normally holds information based on his expertise or position in the business committing violation


a-----In PMI's Code of Ethics, Fairness is ....
A. our duty to make decisions and act impartially and objectively. Our conduct must be free from competing self interest, prejudice, and favoritism.
B. our duty to take ownership for the decisions we make or fail to make, the actions we take or fail to take, and the consequences that result.
C. our duty to understand the truth and act in a truthful manner both in our communication
D. our duty to show a high regard for ourselves, others, and the resources entrusted people, money, reputation, the safety of others, and natural or environmental resources.


d-----In PMI's Code of Ethics, Responsibility is .....
A. our duty to make decisions and act impartially and objectively. Our conduct must be free from competing self interest, prejudice, and favoritism.
B. our duty to understand the truth and act in a truthful manner both in our communication
C. our duty to show a high regard for ourselves, others, and the resources entrusted people, money, reputation, the safety of others, and natural or environmental resources.
D. our duty to take ownership for the decisions we make or fail to make, the actions we take or fail to take, and the consequences that result.


a-----Anonymous is an international hacktivist group and they have a leader in US
A. False
B. True


a-----Online attackers are motivated only by making money.
A. False
B. True


b-----In his speech, Glenn indicates that a conflict in Mark Zuckerberg's behaviors while he said .. and his wife did what of the following activity?
A. Buy a new privacy license from the government
B. Buy a new house and 4 others around his home to protect his privacy
C. Sell a new house with fully security surveillance
D. Sell a privacy license for anyone using facebook
E. Buy a new car with 4 others from different manufacturer


b-----What are the similarities between the trolley car case and the case of the Doctor mentioned in Professor Sandel's speech?
A. Saving five people without killing one person
B. Killing one person to save five people
C. Saving one person without killing five people
D. Killing five people to save one person


c-----What is the process a conscientious worker should follow if he considers to become a whistle-blower
1. Direct his leaders' attention to the issue
2. If efforts to correct the problem through internal channels are hampered or ignored? Apparently, such actions will lead to negative consequences such as retaliation or dismissal.
3. Reporting the matter to outsiders, including federal or state legal agencies
4. Seek to solve the problem by using reasonable resource in the company
A. 1 -> 2 -> 3 -> 4
B. 2 -> 3 -> 4 -> 1
C. 1 -> 4 -> 2 -> 3
D. 2 -> 1 -> 4 -> 3
E. 1 -> 4 -> 3 -> 2
F. 1 -> 3 -> 2 -> 4


b-----The purpose of the Code of Ethics and Professional Conduct by PMI is ...
A. To shape by collective conduct of individual practitioners.
B. To instill confidence in the project management profession and to help an individual become a better practitioner
C. To advance our profession, both individually and collectively, by embracing the Code of Ethics and Professional Conduct
D. To assist in making wise decisions, particularly when faced with difficult situation where we may be asked to compromise our integrity or our values.


d-----Professor Sandel warned about the ...
A. Communism
B. Capitalism
C. Socialism
D. Skepticism


b-----Glenn convinced us to support for the mindset of "Bad people have things to hide, Good people have nothing to hide"
A.True
B. False


c-----BSA is made up of ....
A. Many lawyers
B. Many software developers
C. Many software companies
D. Many police men


c-----According to Barry Schwartz, the negative effects of all choices on people include:
A. D and B
B. C and D
C. A and B
D. A and D
E. B and C
A. It produces paralysis rather than liberation
B.Even if we manage to overcome the paralysis and make a choice, we end up less satisfied with the result of the choice than we would be if we had fewer options to choose from. 
C. It produces less analysis time than less choices in making decision
D. Even if we can manage the analysis time and make a choice carefully, we ....


a-----What is a false information providing?
A. The act of giving inaccurate or incomplete information about a fact.
B. The act of illegally spread business information of the company that they once worked for
C. The act of a party when it fails to comply with the terms and conditions of the contract
D. The act of lying in your personal profile and faking a required IT skill
E. The act of providing money, property or privilege to an individual working in a business or government to gain a business advantage
F. The act of appropriating commodities, services or property by deceiving or perform


d-----In his speech, Steve Vondran indicated these companies as example of BSA member...
A. IBM
B. Adobe
C. Apple
D. Facebook
E. Autodesk
F. Microsoft

(không thấy hết câu hỏi nên khả năng cao là hỏi công ty nào phải BSA member, vì chỉ được chọn 1 đáp án)


a-----The Information Security concept in FPT Software's Information Security Regulation is ..
A. Information Security is what keeps valuable information "free of danger"
B. Information Security determines the Confidentially, Integrity and Availability of Information
C. Information Security secures only the IT infrastructure
D. All of them


a-----According to Confucian conception, ethical norms and codes are ....
1. The three fundamental bonds the five constant virtues
2. The loyalty
3. The three obedience and the four virtues
4. The betrayal
A. 1, 2 and 3
B. All of the others
C. Only 3
D. 2 and 3
E. 1 and 2
F. Only 1


a-----Does freedom of speech give the right to offend?
A. No, it isn't
B. Yes, it is


d-----What is a breach of contract?
A. The act of giving inaccurate or incomplete information about fact
B. The act of appropriating commodities, services or property by deceiving or perform
C. The act of providing money, property or privilege to an individual working in a business or government to gain a business advantage
D. The act of a party when it fails to comply with the terms and conditions of the contract
E. The act of illegally spread business information of the company that they once worked for
F. The act of lying in your personal profile and faking a required IT skill


b-----Categoricalist ... 
A. locates morality in the location of the act
B. locates morality in certain duties and rights
C. locates morality in the results of the act
D. locates morality in the person who do the act


a-----What of the following is in SANS IT CODE OF ETHICS?
A. All of them
B. I treasure and will defend equality, justice and respect of others.
C. I respect intellectual property and will be careful to give credit for other's work. I will never steal or misuse copyrighted, patented material, trade secrets or any other intangible asset.
D. I will not injure others, their property, reputation, or employment by false or malicious
E. I will not steal property, time or resources
F. I will obtain permission before probing systems on a network for vulnerabilities


b-----What information has been stolen and published by hackers in Cyber attack on Vietnam airlines
A. A list of 200.000 regular clients
B. A list of 400.000 regular clients
C. A list of 200.000 VIP clients 
D. A list of 600.000 VIP clients


b-----Which of the following is the motivation of online attackers:
1. By money
2. By the laughs
3. By an opinion
4. By protest
5. By no reason
A. 3, 4, 1, 5
B. 1, 2, 3, 4
C. 2, 3, 4, 5
D. 2, 3, 5, 1
E. 1, 2, 3, 5


b-----In Cat Tuong Salon case, In Dr. Tuong violated medical ethics?
A. It is clear that he didn't violated the ninth article of medical ethical regulation in 20...
B. It is still a question but he violated the regulations on medical examination and tre ... drugs or other medical services
C. He violated the ethics but he didn't violated the regulations on medical works
D. It is clear that he violated the seven vows of Hypocrate


a-----In Chapter 2 of the Code of Ethics for Information Security there are 4 articles regarding ..:
A. Society and Community, Working Attitude, Service Quality and Information Security
B. Society and Community, Writing Attitude, Service Quality and Information Security
C. Society and Community, Working Attitude, Service Quality and Identity System
D. Supplier Responsibility, Working Attitude, Service Quality and Information Security
E. Society and Community, Writing Attitude, Supplier Responsibility and Information Security


c-----In PMI's Code of Ethics, Honesty is ....
A. our duty to take ownership for the decisions we make or fail to make, the actions we take or fail to take, and the consequences that result.
B. our duty to make decisions and act impartially and objectively. Our conduct must be free from competing self interest, prejudice, and favoritism. 
C. our duty to understand the truth and act in a truthful manner both in our communication
D. our duty to show a high regard for ourselves, others, and the resources entrusted people, money, reputation, the safety of others, and natural or environmental resources.


b-----What is WRONG information about Nguyen Phi Hung - the "pioneer" hacker of Vietnamese hacker team joining in cyber-crime competition on world stage?
A. He used the hidden software recording keystrokes to know personal information
B. He was sentenced to 80 months in prison
C. He steal $638 from his fellows' bank accounts by using their personal information
D. He committed crime by an online game with a built-in Trojan program


e-----What is an inflating CV?
A. The act of a party when it fails to comply with the terms and conditions of the contract
B. The act of appropriating commodities, services or property by deceiving or perform
C. The act of providing money, property or privilege to an individual working in a business or government to gain a business advantage
D. The act of giving inaccurate or incomplete information about a fact.
E. The act of lying in your personal profile and faking a required IT skill
F. The act of illegally spread business information of the company that they once worked for


e-----What is a fraud?
A. The act of a party when it fails to comply with the terms and conditions of the contract
B. The act of providing money, property or privilege to an individual working in a business or government to gain a business advantage
C. The act of giving inaccurate or incomplete information about a fact.
D. The act of lying in your personal profile and faking a required IT skill
E. The act of appropriating commodities, services or property by deceiving or perform
F. The act of illegally spread business information of the company that they once worked for


b-----What of the following is NOT an Article in SANS IT CODE OF ETHICS?
A. I will not hesitate to seek assistance or guidance when faced with a task beyond my abilities or experience
B. I will advance private interests at the expense of end users, colleagues, or my employer
C. I will not steal property, time or resources.
D. I will strive to know myself and be honest about my capability


b-----The Code of Ethics for Information Security in Viet Name is originated by which organization?
A. VINASA
B. VNISA
C. VINFAST
D. VINATABA


b-----In PMI's Code of Ethics, Respect is ....
A. our duty to take ownership for the decisions we make or fail to make, the actions we take or fail to take, and the consequences that result.
B. our duty to show a high regard for ourselves, others, and the resources entrusted people, money, reputation, the safety of others, and natural or environmental resources.
C. our duty to make decisions and act impartially and objectively. Our conduct must be free from competing self interest, prejudice, and favoritism. 
D. our duty to understand the truth and act in a truthful manner both in our communication


c-----In common-good approach, an ethical action is ...
A. that provide the greatest balance of good over evil
B. A fair action
C. certain general conditions that are ... equally to everyone's advantage.
D. certain ideals toward which we should strive
E. an action respects the moral rights of everyone


a-----What is Business Software Alliance (BSA)?
A. BSA is a trade group
B. BSA is a law enforcement
C. BSA is the software cops per se
D. BSA is a police group


a-----Imagine that your are a software developer in software company where your boss have ... Defense to develop a new kind of weapons with AI technologies, and he asked you to join. If follows virtue approach, what is the best choice?
A. I will reject to join the project because it will harm people
B. I will evaluate the balancing of the benefits and the costs of the project for the public, ... decision, and I will accept it if when I joined to the team, it leads to maximize the whole benefit
C. I will accept to join the project and I will make it false because it will be a common good
D. I will accept to join the project because it helps me to improve my technology knowledge


c-----The Code of Ethics and Profession Conduct doesn't apply to whom?
A. All PMI members
B. Non-members who serve PMI in a volunteer capacity
C. Non-members who don't have any relationship with PMI
D. Non-members who apply to commence a PMI certification process
E. Individual who are not members of PMI but hold a PMI Certification


c-----In virtue approach, an ethical action is ...
A. certain general conditions that are ... equally to everyone's advantage.
B. an action respects the moral rights of everyone
C. certain ideals toward which we should strive
D. that provide the greatest balance of good over evil
E. A fair action


f-----In Queen vs Dudley and Stephens case, the approach which was not discussed is ____
A. None of the others
B. Utilitarian approach
C. Common Good approach
D. Rights approach
E. Virtue approach
F. Fairness approach


a-----What is bribery?
A. The act of providing money, property or privilege to an individual working in a business or government to gain a business advantage
B. The act of lying in your personal profile and faking a required IT skill
C. The act of giving inaccurate or incomplete information about a fact.
D. The act of a party when it fails to comply with the terms and conditions of the contract
E. The act of illegally spread business information of the company that they once worked for
F. The act of appropriating commodities, services or property by deceiving or perform


b-----How many articles are there in the policy suggested by VNISA? 
A 5 
B. 8 
C. None of the above 
D. 7 
E. 6


d-----What did Edward Snowden, a former technical staff of the National Security Agency, disclose?
A. Confidential information of PRISM Corporation
B. Confidential information of Tempura organization
C. Credit card information of many governmental officers
D. Confidential surveillance programs


d-----Put the following chapters in PMI's Code of Ethics in the right order:
1. Responsibility 
2. Honestly 
3. Fairness 
4. Vision and applicability 
5. Respect 

A. 1-4-5-3-2
B. 1-5-3-2-4
C. 4-5-2-3-1
D. 4-1-5-3-2


a-----Which Samsung's product is sued by Apple in German courts? 
A. Galaxy Tab 10.1 
B. Epic 4G 
C. Nexus S 
D. Galaxy S 4G


c-----What does the Hackers Profiling Project do? 
A. Investigates and hunts cyber-crimes 
B. Latently support hackers and underground groups 
C. Makes research into characteristics, abilities and socialization of hackers 
D. Associates with hackers and underground groups to extort governments and other organizations


a-----What may the aggrieved party do when there's a fundamental breach of the contract? (Choose 2 options) 
A. Remain the contract' s validity and sue the offending party for current recall.
B. Cancel the contract, publish the information to the media 
C. Remain the contract's and ask the offending party to pay compensation 
D. Cancel the contract, require the offending party to pay compensation

A. A, D
B. B, C
C. C, A
D. A, B


b-----What's the main cause that made Ecopark Project become a 'hot spot'? 
A. The project was discovered to be related to bribery 
B. People disagreed with the land compensation policy 
C. There were so many people would like to come and live in Ecopark that it was overloaded 
D. The price of apartments and houses in Ecopark were so high that people couldn't afford it


a-----Who is DigiNotar?
A. A certificates selling company
B. A law company
C. A Linux distributor
D. A large technology corporation
E. A group of hackers to protest


a-----In Glenn Greenwald's speech, "Why privacy matters?", according to Jeremy Bentham, what does the mass surveillance create?
A. A prison in mind
B. The power
C. The social orthodoxy
D. Social norms
E. Human shame
F. Insecurity


c-----According to Professor Michael Sandel, what does philosophy do? 
A. It teaches us how to think logically and find the true happiness that we haven't ever known before.
B. It shows us who we truly are and where we came from 
C. It teaches and unsettles us by confronting us with what we already know. 
D. It shows to that the politics is harmful to our pure spirit


b-----What does BSA (Business Software Alliance) do? 
A. Organize and operate the Software Business community. 
B. Fight against widespread software copyright infringement. 
C. Punish people who violate the software copyright 
D. Manage the Business with Software together to dominate the world


a-----Which Apple's intellectual property is listed by Apple to sue Samsung on April 15, 2011? (Choose all that apply) 
A. patents 
B. color 
C. style 
D. user interface 
E. trade-marks 
F. application (software)

A. A, C, D, E
B. A, B, C, D
C. B, D, E, F
D. A, C, E, F


d-----Which deliberative process is the most related to Virtue Framework of decision making? 
A. What am I doing and where did I come from on Earth? 
B. What are my obligations in this situation and what are the things I should never do? 
C. What kind of outcome should I produce? 
D. What kind of person should I be and what my actions show about my character?


b-----Which of the following are the examples of bribery?
A. Gifting birthday present to your co-worker so that he would be nice to you 
B. Gifting money to your director so that he would promote you. 
C. Gifting virus to your friend to surprise him 
D. Gifting traditional biscuits to your business partners to show your hospitality.


e-----Which of the following actions are consider as FP Software ISMS violations? (Choose all that apply) 
A. Use Google Translate to understand documents given by customer. 
B. Use freeware pTorrent to download document on the internet. 
C. Setup on-product server with password "123456.' 
D. Upload system architecture of the project to slideshare.com

A. A
B. B
C. C
D. D
E. All of the others


b-----What are the bad effects of "having so many options" according to the paradox of choices? (Choose all that applied)
A. With so many options, people loose the freedom
B. With so many options, people find it easy to choose the wrong one
C. With so many options, people find it very difficult to choose at all.
D. With so many options, we end up less satisfied with the result of the choice than we would be if we had fewer options to choose from
A. A, B
B. C, D
C. A, C
D. A, D


a-----Match basic relationships among people in society that Mencius generalized with the appropriate characteristic:
a. king-mandarins
b. parent-children
c. elder-younger siblings
d. husband-wife
e. friend-friend
1. respectful
2. filial piety
3. role differentiation
4. loyal
5. belief

A. a-4, b-2, c-1, d-3, e-5
B. a-3, b-2, c-1, d-5, e-4
C. a-4, b-3, c-2, d-1, e-5
D. a-2, b-1, c-5, d-3, e-4


b-----What is the similarity of 6 famous hacker all around the world in Misha Glenny's speech?
A. They are from Europe
B. They are good at mathematics and computer
C. They are good at phishing attack and DDOS
D. They are from US


b-----Put the following steps of making decision into the correct order:
1. Make a decision and consider it
2. Consider the Parties Involved
3. Gather all the Relevant Information
4. Act
5. Recognizing an Ethical Issue
6. Reflect on the Outcome
7. Formulate Actions and Consider Alternatives

A. 5-2-3-7-1-6-4
B. 5-3-2-7-1-4-6
C. 5-3-2-7-1-6-4
D. 5-2-3-7-1-4-6


b-----Which of the following articles is NOT included in the Universal Declaration of Human Rights (United Nations, December 10, 1948)
A. No one shall be arbitrarily deprived of his property.
B. No one has the right to leave any country, including his own, and to return to his country.
C. No one shall be subjected to torture or to cruel, inhuman or degrading treatment or punishment.
D. No one shall be subjected to arbitrary arrest, detention or exile.


b-----According to FPT Software ISMS, what does information security incident no lead to?
A. Financial losses and costs
B. Employment dismissal due to performance
C. Devaluation of intellectual property
D. Reputation and brand damage N.


b-----Who is considered as the "father" of Confucianism?
A. Qian Zi
B. Kong Zi
C. Lao Zi
D. Cong Zi


a-----Who are the "seeders" of Utilitarianism, who viewed happiness as the only good? (Choose all that applied)
A. Aristotle
B. Aristippus
C. Epicurus
D. Socrates
E. John Stuart Mill
F. Jeremy Bentham

A. B, C
B. D, E
C. A, F
D. E, F


c-----What does CIA in FPT Software ISMS stand for?
A. Compatibility, Information and Availability
B. Compatibility, Information and Availability
C. Confidentiality, Integrity and Availability


d-----What is Stunex? 
A. A computer spyware 
B. A computer trojan 
C. A computer ransomware 
D. A computer worm 
E. None of the above 
F. A computer adware


d-----How was VCCorp attacked on Monday, October 13, 2014? 
A. Attackers added spyware to the server of VCCorp 
B. Attackers added key logger to the server of VCCorp 
C. Attackers tried to DDOS the system of VCCorp
D. Attackers faked users to install spyware


c-----Which the group of online attackers does Anonymous belong to? 
A. Criminals who do it for money 
B. Nation states 
C. Hacktivist 
D. Criminals who do it for being notorious


b-----How does the official dogma of all Western industrial societies run?
A. If we are interested in maximizing the freedom of our citizens, the way to do that is to maximize individual welfare.
B. If we are interested in maximizing the welfare of our citizens, the way to do that is to maximize individual freedom.
C. If we are interested in maximizing the choices of our citizens, the way to do that is to maximize individual freedom.
D. If we are interested in maximizing the choices of our citizens, the way to do that is to maximize individual welfare.


c-----According to Barry Schwartz, what's the "secret to happiness.?
A. Low carbon diet
B. Low living cost
C. Low expectation
D. High income
E. High living cost
F. High expectation


a-----What is the motivation of Duty Framework for decision making?
A. Aim is to perform the right action
B. Aim is to develop one's character
C. None of the above
D. Aim is to produce the most good


b-----Fill in the blank with the name of an intellectual property type:
The name "Coca cola" is an example of_________
A. patent
B. trade-mark
C. trade secrets
D. copyright


c-----Why should you care about intellectual property? (Choose all that applied) 
A. Because individual values are in intellectual property
B. Because project values are in intellectual property
C. Because all values are in intellectual property
D. Because company values are in intellectual property
E. Because invention values are in intellectual property

A. A, B, C
B. A, D, E
C. B, D, E
D. B, C, D


a-----According to FPT Software ISMS, which of the following are examples of information? (Choose all that apply)
A. A photo
B. A Facebook post
C. A Skype message
D. A computer without hard disk
E. A meeting notes
F. A CPU chip

A. A, B, C, E
B. A, B, D, E
C. B, D, E, F
D. A, B, D, F


d-----Match the 4 types of IP to its corresponding definition.
IP types:
a. A patent
b. A trade-mark
c. A trade secret
d. A copyright
Definition:
1. is the right to exclude other people from making whatever you've created.
2. is with the author it lasts for the life of the author plus, a number of years that keeps increasing and so as an author.
3. is a recognizable sign, design, or expression which identifies products or services of a particular source from those of others.
4. is a formula, practice, process, design, instrument, pattern, commercial method, or compilation of information not generally known or reasonably ascertainable by others
A. a-3, b-4, c-2, d-1
B. a-1, b-2, c-3, d-4
C. a-2, b-1, c-4, d-3
D. a-1, b-3, c-4, d-2


d-----Which of the following are included in the Code of Ethics for IS in Vietnam?
A. Always tell the truth.
B. Organizations, businesses and individuals practicing in providing IS related services for other organizations/individuals are subjects of implication of IS Ethics.
C. Conflict of interests happens when Individuals/Organizations whose interests are affected in making decision related to other parties.
D. Do not abuse the trust given by individuals/organizations.

A. B, C
B. A, B
C. C, D
D. A, D


c, d-----Which of the following relations are considered in "humaneness" term in Confucianism? (Choose 2 options)

A. Relation between king and mandarines
B. Relation between father and son
C. Relation between human-being with oneself
D. Man-to-man relationE. Relation between husband and wife


f-----Fill in the blank:
_______is the act of appropriating commodities, services or property by deceiving or performing tricks.
A. Providing false information
B. Breach of contract
C. Whistle-blowing
D. Bribery
E. Inflating CV
F. Fraud


a-----Fill in the blank:
The _____ approach to ethics has its roots in the teachings of the ancient Greek philosopher Aristotle, who said that "equals should
be treated equally and unequals unequally''.
A. fairness or justice
B. common-good
C. rights
D. virtue
E. utilitarian


a-----Your Vice President of Sales decides to add more sales representatives for the summer based on analyses of sales trends over the last five years. What level of information is she acting on?

A.Wisdom

B.Data

C.Knowledge

D.Information


c-----You have collected social media posts with a specific hashtag for an analysis of the words used in the post? What kind of data is that?

A.Semi-Structured

B.Structured

C.Unstructured


c-----If you are doing an analysis of data to determine which of several small businesses you should purchase to gain the maximum benefit to your overall company finances, what type of analysis are you doing?

A.Predictive

B.Descriptive

C.Prescriptive


a-----If your company needs to do the same analysis as new data comes in every month, what is the best term to describe that process?

A.Pipeline

B.Workflow


a-----What is the Turing test used for?

A.To test whether an AI system is capable of thinking like a human being.

B.To test whether an AI system is capable of tricking a person into thinking it's another person.

C.To test whether an AI system is trustworthy.


a-----How is a Machine Learning (ML) system different from a Deep Learning (DL) system?

A.A ML system needs a human to provide the feature extraction.

B.A ML system does all of the feature extraction and classification.

C.A ML system learns from its mistakes.


a, b-----Why are deep learning and machine learning called narrow?

A.Narrow can only perform the specific tasks it was designed to do.

B.Narrow AI can't handle situations that its training data didn't prepare it for.

C.Narrow AI is dependent on hand-coding of its algorithms.


c-----If you were faced with an AI system that identifies exactly what individuals will be infected in a pandemic of a novel disease before the first case occurs, what kind of AI is this? 

A.Narrow AI

B.General AI

C.Superintelligence


a-----What is ambient intelligence?

A.Linked IoT technology that is always on and acting to personalize the experience for the people within its environment.

B.Linked IoT technology that collects and stores data about a home or office environment.

C.Linked IoT technology that conducts covert surveillance for the government on the people within its environment.


b-----Which of the following describes the black box problem in AI?

A.It is difficult to understand the nature of the data being used to train an AI model.

B.It is difficult to understand how or why an AI system made a particular decision.

C.It is difficult to understand the results that come from an AI system.


c-----When can non-identifiable data become PII?

A.When it is shared.

B.When it is a name.

C.When combined with other information.


b, d-----What is an example of a security feature on an IoT which may be a risk?

A.Environmental sensor 

B.Lack of user interface

C.Data collection

D.Default password


c-----What makes consent truly voluntary?

A.When it is done electronically.

B.When the default consent is opting out.

C.When a person has the ability to withdraw consent at any time.


a-----What is a method used in data management to protect privacy?

A.Pseudonymization 

B.Deontology 

C.Universalizability


a-----A business is seeking to increase profits by creating a new software application. By follow the principles in privacy by design do they need to select profits over privacy?

A.Yes, it is impossible for companies to be profitable when they have to ensure privacy.

B.No, companies can achieve privacy for their users and still be profitable.


a-----What is epsilon?

A.It is the metric of the privacy loss with a differential change in data.

B.It is the removal of direct identifiers.

C.It is the mathematical definition of privacy.


a-----A privacy budget combats what?

A.The breakdown of privacy.

B.Overspending by accountants.

C.Ambient Intelligence


b-----Select one example of responsibility. 

A.The teacher requires an explanation when a student does not perform a task.

B.A single student chooses to lead the project. 

C.A teacher assigns a project to a group of students.


b-----What is a "Hash" in block chain?

A.It acts as the central authority in the smart contract. 

B.It is basically an encrypted code calculated when the data is added to the block 

C.It Is a trusted central mediator that can supervise the transaction.


a-----You can have a positive bias.

A.True

B.False


a-----What term best describes the statement "old people forget things"

A.Stereotype

B.Prejudice

C.Ethnocentrism


a, b, c-----What creates implicit bias?

A.Direct exposure to biased statements and actions by family and friends.

B.Lack of contact with diverse groups of people.

C.Indirect exposure to stereotypes via the media.


c-----Saying you are less likely than others to have bad things happen to you is an example of which bias?

A.Anchoring bias

B.Fundamental Attribution Error

C.Optimism bias


b-----Assuming that your opinions are held by the majority of people is ane example of what bias?

A.Group attribution error

B.False consensus effect


c-----Whast will help you combat confirmation bias's impact on decision making?

A.Asking people who are similar to you what they think you should do.

B.Making a quick decision after looking at a few sources.

C.Seek out opposing opinions.


a-----How does temporal bias impact the collection and analysis of social media data if people start a Twitter debate using a hashtag but then stop using it even though the debate continues?

A.Data collection using the hashtag will not get a complete dataset because the use of the hashtag was limited to a time period that was less than the total debate.

B.Data collection using the hashtag will be the best way to get the tweets from the time period of the debate.


a-----What is the risk of automation and complacency biases?

A.Humans' ability to make decisions will be eroded.

B.AI robots will take over the world.


a-----Polling voters on Mondays and Fridays during the mornings would be enough to avoid sampling bias.

A.False

B.True


a-----What does it mean for an imperative to be categorical?

A.It applies to everyone in all situations.

B.It applies to specific goals or circumstances.

C.It is based on conditions.


a-----Which of the following formulations of the categorical imperative promotes the idea of universalizability?

A.The first formulation

B.The second formulation

C.The third formulation


b-----Which of the following ideas suggests that the happiness of the self is of the greatest utility?

A.Altruism

B.Egoism

C.Consequentialism


c-----Which of the following did Socrates call the only true virtue?

A.Utility

B.Temperance

C.Knowledge

D.Modesty


c-----Which of the following is an example of a norm?

A.Charity is one of the most important human acts.

B.It is wrong to lie.

C.Giving other people their personal space.

D.Cheating on an exam is unethical and should warrant academic punishment.


b-----Which of the following describes the independence condition of moral agency?

A.The ability to rationally deliberate on one's own choices.

B.The ability to make one's own choices without being under another's control.

C.The ability to personally assess one's own values.


c-----Which of the following is an example of moral reasoning?

A.When I steal something, I feel guilty, so I know that stealing is wrong.

B.Murder is wrong because it is against the law.

C.It is wrong for me to look through my friend's phone because my friend may find out and no longer trust me, which will negatively affect our relationship.


a-----Which of the following describes applied ethics?

A.The practical implementation of ethics in a specific field of study.

B.Applied ethics is concerned with addressing how different fields or industries may have different ethical concerns.

C.Questioning what it means for something to be ethically right or wrong.


b-----Which of the following are human rights that cannot be taken away?

A.Divine rights

B.Inalienable rights

C.Legal rights


d-----Which of the following is a concern for environmental ethics?

A.The ethics of one organization entering into a partnership with another organization.

B.The risks of designing and building bridges to support vehicle traffic.

C.The ethics of administering untested or unproven drugs to patients.

D.The treatment of entire ecosystems as moral agents.


b-----Which of the following describes an autonomous being?

A.A being who is able to act on instinct.

B.A being who is able to make rational decisions.

C.A being who makes decisions based on external influence.


a-----Which of the following is an application of restorative justice? 

A.Reforming criminals to be moral members of society.

B.Punishing criminals to balance their wrongdoing.

C.Fulfilling people's fundamental needs, like food and shelter.


c-----What is the primary goal of beneficence? 

A.To perform actions that benefit society as a whole.

B.To minimize harm.

C.To achieve what is morally good.


b-----Which of the following is an example of non-maleficence? 

A.Designing a humanoid robot to cheer up sick children in hospitals.

B.Preventing AI from unfairly targeting people based on race or other protected status.

C.Using an AI system to increase sales for an organization.


a-----True or false? Any being with personhood status is morally responsible for their actions.

A.True

B.False


b-----Which of the following AI concepts would give rise to personhood among intelligent machines?

A.Narrow AI

B.Artificial general intelligence (AGI)

C.Self-learning robots


a-----Which of the following is a strategic benefit of having an ethical organization?

A.An ethical organization is more likely to inspire brand loyalty.

B.An ethical organization is more likely to develop cutting-edge technologies.

C.An ethical organization is more likely to avoid being audited.


c-----At what point in the development lifecycle of an AI project should ethics be incorporated?

A.During development of the project.

B.During deployment of the project.

C.During planning of the project.


a-----What is the primary benefit of engineering activism?

A.It encourages technical personnel to reflect on their motivations and responsibilities for creating an intelligent system.

B.It leads to greater financial outcomes as a result of ethically engineered AI systems.

C.It convinces the public that a particular AI product won't mistreat them or their personal information.


a-----Which school of philosophical thought primarily advocates for a global moral code?

A.Deontology

B.Utilitarianism

C.Virtue ethics


b-----How is a philosophical theory different from an ethical framework?

A.Philosophical theories are actionable and ethical frameworks are ideals.

B.Philosophical theories are ideals and ethical frameworks are actionable.

C.Phical theories and ethical frameworks are essentially the same.


b-----Which area of the Beijing AI Principles emphasizes AI that is for the good of humanity, has controlled risks, and is open.

A.Governance

B.Research and development

C.Usage


c-----What is one of the recommendations for governments?

A.Promote human values.

B.Promote transparency in AI.

C.Promote international cooperation.


a-----What is the capability caution?

A.We need to remember that we don't know the full extent of what AI systems might become capable of so that we can better plan.

B.We need to take steps to ensure that humans capabilities are not limited by AI growth.

C.We need to freeze AI's capabilities at the current state so that we can ensure AI systems won't take over the world.


a-----What percentage of frameworks include privacy as a core tenet?

A.50%

B.85%

C.25%


b-----What percentage of frameworks include transparency?

A.75%

B.85%

C.95%


a-----Which subset of transparency involves describing the system to a non-expert?

A.Explainability

B.Interpretability

C.Auditability


a-----What is non-maleficence?

A.The principle of doing no harm.

B.The principle of having no bias.

C.The principle of having no security risks.


c-----What does the AMA say the "A" in AI should stand for?

A.Amplified

B.Artificial

C.Augmented


a-----What would a utilitarian most likely do when faced with the trolley problem?

A.Switch the tracks so that the trolley kills the lone person.

B.Do nothing, allowing the trolley to kill the group of people.

C.Attempt to untie the group of people from the tracks.


c-----In a variant of the trolley problem, there are sentient non-humans on the tracks instead of humans. Which of the following ethical frameworks specifically focuses on minimizing harm to all sentient life, rather than just humans?

A.Asilomar AI Principles

B.Beijing AI Principles

C.Montreal Declaration for Responsible AI


b-----How do the Universal Guidelines for AI (UGAI) fall short when it comes to applying the stated principles to an ethical dilemma?

A.The UGAI are useful only in a narrow subset of scenarios.

B.The UGAI leave a lot of room for interpretation.

C.The UGAI lack a termination clause.


c-----In a scenario where an automated system takes the place of a doctor analyzing a patient, why is the education principle in the Beijing AI Principles so crucial?

A.The developer of the automated system is able to learn from the system's mistakes, making it easier to improve that system in the future.

B.The patient is more likely to understand the reasons for the automated system failing, and accept them.

C.The doctor is better prepared to answer questions in the event the automated system fails.


a-----Which of the following is a drawback to relying on the Beijing AI Principles to address the question of whether or not AI should enable self-destructive behavior?

A.The Beijing AI Principles lack specificity.

B.The Beijing AI Principles cannot be applied to the early stages of development.

C.The Beijing AI Principles conflict with business needs.


c-----Which of the following is a benefit of using the OECD AI Principles to address the limitation concerns of persuasive technology?

A.The OECD Principles are supported by many real-world examples of their application.

B.The OECD Principles are specifically geared toward answering ethical questions surrounding persuasive technology.

C.The OECD Principles combine responsible disclosure and well-being into a single framework.


b-----In which of the following situations might it be ethically justifiable to breach patient confidentiality?

A.When a patient fails to show up for an appointment.

B.When a patient expresses an intent to harm themselves or others.

C.When a patient is suspected of stealing medicine.


b-----How does IEEE Ethically Aligned Design treat individual autonomy in data-driven systems?

A.It encourages systems to be designed so that they amplify individual autonomy, ensuring that users aren't be treated unfairly.

B.It encourages systems to be designed so that they limit individual autonomy to preserve the social fabric.

C.It encourages systems to take a hands-off approach to individual autonomy so as not to interfere with business goals.


b-----How do the principles of openness and sharing the Beijing AI Principles help alleviate concerns about "emancipated" AI?

A.These principles ensure that intellectual property (IP) rights don't get in the way of transparency needs.

B.These principles enable the public to verify the behavior of the emancipated system.

C.These principles prevent emancipated AI from acquiring a greater amount of control than it already has.


c-----Which of the following is a benefit of applying the Toronto Declaration to the problem of AI-driven harassment?

A.The Toronto Declaration is specifically focused on preventing all forms of AI-based harassment.

B.The Toronto Declaration provides prescriptive guidance for encouraging open research while also protecting human rights.

C.The Toronto Declaration aligns with a large number of jurisdictions.


b-----Which of the following describes regulations?

A.They have no legal weight.

B.They are meant to improve trust in society between entities.

C.They are enforced by subject matter experts.


a-----GDPR applies to which of the following entities?

A.Any entity that processes the personal data of European Union citizens.

B.All entities in the world that process personal data.

C.Only entities that are headquartered in the European Union.


c-----To which of the following situations would CCPA be applicable?

A.A company outside the US that has 25% of its annual revenue come from the selling of California citizens' personal data.

B.A company that is based in California, and which handles the personal data of up to 25,000 users.

C.A company that does business in California, and whose annual gross revenue is $50 million.


b-----What is the primary asset that HIPAA is meant to protect?

A.Personally identified information (PII)

B.Personal health information (PHI)

C.Proprietary business data (PBD)


b-----Which of the following activities is guaranteed by FERPA regarding a parent's handling of their children's education records?

A.Parents having full control over the disclosure of their children's education records.

B.Parents being able to access their children's education records.

C.Parents being able to amend their children's education records.


a-----Which of the following describes standards?

A.They focus on specific implementation of industry goals.

B.They focus on outlining the high-level goals of an industry.

C.They determine the legal responsibilities of an industry.


b-----Which of the following is a component of the Cybersecurity Framework (CSF)?

A.Providing guidelines to federal agencies for architecting cybersecurity systems.

B.Enabling private sector organizations to assess and improve their cybersecurity activities.

C.Helping both private sector and public sector organizations to comply with cybersecurity laws and regulations.


a-----Which of the following methods ensures that CIS CSC enables a proactive approach to minimizing security risks with customer information?

A.Incorporating the framework throughout the software development lifecycle.

B.Applying the framework to incident response processes.

C.Limiting the use of automation in enforcing security controls.


b-----Which of the following ISO standards has a focus on securing the virtual environments in a cloud service infrastructure?

A.ISO 27001

B.ISO 27017

C.ISO 27018


c-----Which of the following resources is provided by the MITRE ATT&CK Framework?

A.Network configuration best practices

B.Software vulnerabilities

C.Adversarial group profiles


a-----Which of the following describes ethics washing?

A.The organization publicly claims to follow ethical principles, but doesn't follow them internally.

B.The organization transfers the burden of ethical practices onto a third party.

C.The organization undergoes a rigorous evaluation of its ethical practices to identify weak points.


b-----Which of the following is a component of the data minimization principle?

A.Data storage allocation

B.Terms of data retention

C.Data transmission performance


b-----Which of the following is a useful strategy for reconciling compliance vs. cost?

A.Reducing expensive compliance tasks.

B.Assessing the reputational cost of non-compliance.

C.Petitioning regulatory and standards bodies for financial assistance in meeting compliance.


c-----How can participatory design help reconcile conflicts between stakeholder needs and ethical decision making?

A.It can add weight to collective stakeholder input over ethical decision-making concerns.

B.It can provide an objective basis for making ethical decisions that supersede stakeholder concerns.

C.It can balance the needs of the group with the needs of the individual.


b-----In systemic fragility, which of the following behaviors can undermine the robustness of a system?

A.Lack of continuous improvement

B.Unforeseen patterns of use

C.Misconfigured security settings


c-----Which of the following describes the democratization of AI?

A.Encouraging the public to vote on how an AI system should be designed.

B.Providing the public with the tools and knowledge to change AI systems.

C.Making complex AI technologies more accessible to the public.


a-----Which of the following is the primary mechanism for reconciling the conflict between big data generation and concentration of power in Big Tech?

A.Regulations

B.Industry standards

C.Organizational policy


a-----Which of the following mechanisms is concerned a "first check" in reconciling the conflict between streamlining user experiences and enabling human agency?

A.An ethics-by-design approach

B.Regulations

C.User testing


b-----How does an evidence-based approach to ethical policy differ from moral relativism?

A.Evidence-based policy considers cultural contexts first and foremost, whereas moral relativism does not.

B.Evidence-based policy uses empirical data to measure impacts, whereas moral relativism does not.

C.Evidence-based policy can only be used in limited circumstances, whereas moral relativism is universal in applicability.


a-----At which of the following project lifecycle phases should a discussion of stakeholder interests begin?

A.Conception/initiation

B.Design

C.Development


a, d-----Which of the following are fundamental risk management tasks? (Select two.)

A.Mitigation

B.Authentication

C.Compliance

D.Identification


c-----Why is it important to include stakeholders from diverse areas of business when identifying risks?

A.It is a legal requirement in many jurisdictions.

B.It includes more perspectives, which can lead to better risk identification.

C.It gives you an opportunity to identify people as risks.


a-----When it comes to protecting private data, which of the following could be the root cause of a problem?

A.The data was stored insecurely.

B.The data was leaked online.

C.The data was deleted from storage.


c-----What kind of shape does a normal distribution take on when plotted in a histogram?

A.Tail shape

B.Square shape

C.Bell shape


d-----Which of the following accurately describes the measures of central tendency in a normal distribution?

A.The mean is higher than both the median and mode.

B.The median is equal to the mode, and both are higher than the mean.

C.The mode is higher than the mean, but lower than the median.

D.The mean, median, and mode are the same.


a-----Which of the following measures is best suited for reporting results to an audience?

A.Standard deviation

B.Variance


b-----Which type of kurtosis is most likely to indicate the strong presence of outliers?

A.Mesokurtic

B.Leptokurtic

C.Platykurtic


b, c-----Which of the following are cost functions used to evaluate linear regression models? (Select two.)

A.Accuracy

B.Mean squared error (MSE)

C.Root mean squared error (RMSE)

D.Recall


c-----During cross-validation, which of the following dataset splits is used to tune the performance of a model?

A.Training set

B.Test set

C.Validation test


a-----Why is it important to consider Goodhart's law?

A.A model might optimize one metric at the expense of others.

B.A model might be ineffective in its applicable domain.

C.A model might change its task from classification to regression, or vice versa.


b-----Which of the following is an example of first-party data?

A.Demographic data obtained from market research.

B.Personal preferences obtained from users' social media profiles.

C.Online activity information obtained from web browser cookies.

D.Predicted user behavior obtained from AI models.


a-----Which of the following is an example of cross-correlation of data?

A.Compiling a single user's online shopping activity that is stored in two separate databases, under two slightly different names.

B.Combining two separate users' online shopping activities into a single data point with a single identifier.

C.Making predictions about multiple users' online shopping activities based on the activity of a single user.


b-----Which of the following best describes what goes into a marketing persona?

A.Personal information about a real customer.

B.General information about an archetypal customer.

C.Detailed information about a segment of customers.


b-----Why is an end user license agreement (EULA) not enough to satisfy consent when it comes to tracking user data?

A.EULAs are too simple to be used as the basis for consent in a court of law.

B.Consent must be meaningful and conscious, which an EULA does not ensure.

C.EULAs are easily spoofed by malicious users.


a, b-----Which of the following are assessed by a compliance audit? (Select two.)

A.The specific compliance requirements that the organization is failing to meet.

B.Recommendations for how the organization can rectify any compliance shortcomings.

C.The laws or regulations the organization has chosen to comply with.

D.The organization's opinions about the laws and regulations it is required to comply with.


c-----Which of the following is a useful method for an organization to manage consent over time?

A.Manually renew a user's consent every so often.

B.Automatically revoke a user's consent every so often.

C.Provide renewed consent agreements to the user every so often.


b-----Which of the following describes an opt-in procedure for consenting to data use?

A.The user tells the organization that it is allowed to handle the data.

B.The user tells the organization that it is not allowed to handle the data.

C.The user tells the organization that they do not care if the data is handled.


b-----A user inputs a password to a website, and the website verifies the user is who they say they are. What is this verification an example of?

A.Identification

B.Authentication

C.Authorization


c-----How does a VPN differ from a proxy?

A.VPNs hide only web traffic, whereas proxies hide all traffic.

B.VPNs anonymize traffic, proxies do not.

C.VPNs encrypt traffic, proxies do not.


b-----What does it mean to require a zero-knowledge protocol to be "sound"?

A.If the prover is wrong, he or she cannot convince the verifier with any significant probability.

B.If both prover and verified are honest, the verified will be convinced through the process.

C.The verifier learns nothing about the prover's statement other than it is true.


b-----How does the use of open source libraries pose a challenge to accountability?

A.It's not easy to gain access to open source libraries.

B.There isn't necessarily a single "corporate person" responsible for an open source library.

C.Open source libraries are often difficult to understand, even for seasoned developers.


a-----Which of the following is generally true regarding the effect of automation on complacency?

A.The more reliable a system is, the more complacent its operators will be.

B.The less reliable a system is, the more complacent its operators will be.

C.The reliability of a system has no effect on operator complacency.


d-----Which of the following is a type of algorithm that is typically associated with the idea of a black box?

A.Clustering

B.Decision trees

C.Linear regression

D.Artificial neural networks (ANNs)


b-----Why do gaps in governance make it difficult to hold people accountable?

A.It is difficult to prosecute those responsible in a court of law.

B.It's not clear who is responsible for what in each area.

C.Responsibility is assigned to the wrong people for the wrong things.


b-----How can an auditor be held accountable?

A.They can be held accountable for any areas where the organization is failing to meet compliance.

B.They can be held accountable for what they discovered while conducting the audit.

C.They can be held accountable for implementing corrective actions in non-compliant areas.


a, c-----Which of the following are types of responsibilities assigned in a RACI matrix? (Select two.)

A.Accountable

B.Required

C.Consulted

D.Influenced


a-----When is a pilot test conducted within the project lifecycle?

A.Before development

B.During development

C.After development


b-----Which of the following steps of AIA development and implementation enable the public to engage with an organization that fails to meet its AIA requirements?

A.Pre-acquisition review

B.Due process challenge

C.Disclosure requirements

D.Comments


c, d-----Which of the following are important components to provide to typical users in a data visualization? (Select two.)

A.Giving the user all possible variations of a particular visualization.

B.Restricting sort and filter options.

C.Informing the user about what context they are in at all times.

D.Enabling the user to zoom into and out of a visualization.


b-----Which of the following is a key performance indicator (KPI) that might be found on a dashboard that tracks development of an AI system?

A.A table of model evaluation metrics.

B.A spreadsheet of the entire dataset used in training.

C.A collection of graphs that spans several pages.


b-----Which of the following describes a closed source application?

A.An application whose source code cannot be modified by the developer.

B.An application whose source code is not freely available for anyone to view or copy.

C.An application whose source code cannot be explained.


a-----Which of the following is a negative impact on transparency when it comes to shadow banning users?

A.The user is unaware of being banned and therefore cannot contest the ban.

B.The user wants to know why they were banned, but they are not given an explanation.

C.The user cannot access the platform they were banned from, and therefore cannot view its contents.


a-----How can you ensure there is oversight in an AI system during deployment?

A.Design the training process to be more transparent and less of a black box.

B.Let the AI make decisions without human interference.

C.Conduct periodic assessments of its decision-making capabilities.


b-----True or False? In a classification and regression tree (CART), classification decisions are only made at the end of the tree.

A.True

B.False


a-----Which of the following resources would be helpful in explaining the machine learning process to a layperson?

A.A flow diagram of the overall steps in the process.

B.A scatter plot showing the relationship between two variables.

C.A step-by-step deconstruction of the formulas used by machine learning algorithms to train models.


a-----Which of the following is the best way for an organization to solicit feedback from users in an online setting?

A.Placing a form on a marketing website, encouraging users to fill it out.

B.Sending text messages to users' phones, asking for feedback.

C.Directly emailing users, asking for feedback.


b-----Which of the following accurately describes the role of a data discloser?

A.Any entity that requests access to the data.

B.Any entity that provides data to an entity that requests said data.

C.Any entity that mediates the relationship between the entity that provides the data and the entity that requests it.


c-----Why is it important to be up front about inadequacies in training data?

A.By being up front about training data inadequacies, you are absolving yourself of the responsibility for any negative consequences.

B.Being up front about training data inadequacies helps the organization avoid legal trouble.

C.The training data is the model's worldview, so the model's outcomes will be affected if that training data is inadequate.


b-----When a Shapley value shows how much each feature contributed to predicting the label, what type of model interpretability does this support?

A.Focused interpretability

B.Global interpretability

C.Local interpretability


a-----Which of the following machine learning explainability tools produces results that are most appropriate for presenting to managers, executives, and other non-technical personnel?

A.ELI5

B.LIME

C.What-If


a-----True or False? Implicit bias requires an intent to be biased.

A.True

B.False


a-----Which of the following data collection activities can lead to sampling bias?

A.Collecting data on groups of people disproportionately.

B.Collecting data that has outliers.

C.Collecting data that has too many features.


b-----Which of the following is a type of edge case that is the result of missing or incorrect values?

A.Outliers

B.Errors

C.Noise


b-----Which of the following is a risk that could arise if you fail to analyze models in different environments?

A.The model may not meet the desired evaluation metrics.

B.The model may not generalize well to a wider set of scenarios.

C.The model may not comply with data sharing agreements.


a-----How can modeling personas help identify risks to fairness and non-discrimination?

A.Comparing personas to an AI model's results can help you identify biases in the model.

B.Feeding the personas as input to an AI model prevents that model from discriminating against groups identified in the persona.

C.Creating personas eliminates the need to rely on AI-based systems for customer segmentation.


a-----True or False? Inclusive design requirements can be met by multiple products.

A.True

B.False


a, d-----Which of the following environments are included in a STEEPV analysis? (Select two.)

A.Economic

B.Philosophical

C.Scientific

D.Technological


a, b-----Which of the following should be considered when employing user testing? (Select two.)

A.Establish how to use test results to improve the product.

B.Set up a testing scenario that can be replicated.

C.Have a single test at the end of development.

D.Conduct a single kind of test for each product.


b, c-----Which of the following are benefits of employing bias bounties in emerging technologies? (Select two.)

A.The people affected by a piece of technology can be assured that the product is free of bias.

B.The developer can address the bias in a piece of technology more quickly.

C.The bounty hunter receives a reward.

D.The users of the technology will encounter fewer bugs.


a-----Which of the following types of neural networks is radioactive data tracing most applicable to?

A.Convolutional neural network (CNN)

B.Recurrent neural network (RNN)

C.Artificial neural network (ANN)


c-----An attacker fools an AI-based anti-spam system into thinking the attacker's email messages are benign. This enables the attacker's emails to reach their destination(s) without being blocked. What type of adversarial machine learning is this?

A.Spoofing

B.Poisoning

C.Evasion


d-----What is the primary motivating factor behind hacktivism?

A.The desire to make money.

B.The desire to serve an authority figure.

C.The desire to spread fear.

D.The desire for social change.


b-----Which of the following types of malware monitors a user's behavior without their knowledge or permission?

A.Virus

B.Spyware

C.Ransomware

D.Trojan horse


c-----If you were to place the task "Apply security patch to system" on an attack tree diagram, what category would it be assigned to?

A.Threat

B.Vector

C.Control


a-----What is the function of a red team in a penetration testing exercise?

A.To conduct the simulated attacks.

B.To defend against the simulated attacks.

C.To officiate the simulated attacks.


b, c-----Which of the following are objectives of a forensic analysis? (Select two.)

A.To inform stakeholders that an incident has occurred.

B.To determine what occurred in an incident.

C.To identify who or what is responsible for an incident.

D.To mitigate the effects of an incident.


b-----Which of the following describes the goal of integrity when it comes to cybersecurity?

A.Ensuring that data is kept private.

B.Ensuring that data hasn't been modified without authorization.

C.Ensuring that data is accessible to those who need it.


a, b-----Which of the following are transport encryption protocols? (Select two.)

A.SSL/TLS

B.SSH

C.FTP

D.HTTP


c-----Which of the following is a platform that includes hundreds of security exploit tools?

A.Zenmap

B.Nmap

C.Kali Linux

D.Wireshark


c-----Which of the following describes the purpose of a SIEM?

A.To launch simulated attacks on systems and networks.

B.To assess and assign severity scores to flaws in software or hardware.

C.To aggregate alerts from disparate sources into a single analysis platform.

D.To protect the confidentiality and integrity of data as it is transmitted over a network.


b-----Which of the following risk categories deals with stakeholder responsibility in creating and using data-driven technologies?

A.Explainability

B.Accountability

C.Transparency


a-----To uphold transparency and explainability, communication about data-driven technologies should be...

A.Clear, concise, and coherent

B.Complex, convincing, and contained

C.Caring, consistent, and creative


c-----Which of the following is an adequate definition of a stakeholder?

A.All internal employees.

B.All internal employees and external customers.

C.All people who have an impact or are impacted by the organization.


c-----Which of the following can help mitigate the unwillingness to accept feedback?

A.Engage in cultural awareness and cultural sensitivity.

B.Create and participate in a risk culture.

C.Communicate the importance of feedback in refining a product.


a, c-----Which of the following are pitfalls in communicating risks to the organization? (Select two.)

A.Having a disjointed message.

B.Following up messaging with an audience.

C.Not paying attention to the flow of messaging.

D.Coordinating a message between departments.


a-----Why is suspicion a pitfall in communicating ethical risks to society?

A.Suspicion involves fear of some technology that is not completely known.

B.Suspicion leads to aggressive rejection of a technology.

C.Suspicion makes it impossible to convince people of the benefits of a technology.


a-----Which of the following describes the purpose of a business impact assessment (BIA)?

A.It helps you predict business interruptions and develop recovery strategies.

B.It helps you identify what risks you can accept or transfer to third party.

C.It helps you evaluate how a product or service could fail to apply ethical values to a society.


c, d-----Which of the following are challenges that can arise if you fail to communicate about the social impact of ethical risks? (Select two.)

A.Decreased corporate revenue

B.Reduced of brand loyalty

C.Disenfranchisement

D.Erosion of rights


a-----Why is it important to maintain public trust?

A.Trust, once lost, is difficult to regain.

B.Trust is required to avoid legal pitfalls.

C.Trust can be used against the organization.


a-----Why is it important to take a proactive approach to addressing liability issues?

A.The law often lags behind innovation.

B.The law is not always applied consistently.

C.The law is not always clear.


a, b-----Which of the following is a consequence of an organization not being diverse, equitable, and inclusive? (Select two.)

A.Reputational damage

B.Litigation

C.Data breaches


a-----Which of the following is a benefit of crafting an organizational philosophy?

A.It informs employee behavior.

B.It boost organizational reputation.

C.It reduces bias and discrimination.


c-----The decisions in a vision statement must be properly aligned with what?

A.A business impact assessment (BIA)

B.A specific ethical framework.

C.The organizational philosophy.


b-----Which of the following describes a disclosure statement?

A.A document that provides sensitive information to third parties.

B.A document that outlines the risks and responsibilities of a financial transaction.

C.A document that describes the conflicts of an interest in an organization.


c-----Which of the following does corporate reporting provide?

A.A report of the steps taken to mitigate ethical risks.

B.A report of the current technological landscape in the organization's chosen field.

C.A report of the financial health of an organization.


b-----Which of the following can make or break a media campaign?

A.Corporate reports

B.Stakeholders

C.Regulatory compliance


a-----Which of the following is a primary purpose of public education campaigns?

A.They ensure the public can make informed decisions.

B.They ensure the public is more likely to purchase your products or services.

C.They ensure the public is not critical about the application of emerging technologies.


b-----Which of the following is a consequence of negative traction on social media?

A.Negative traction cannot be recovered from.

B.Negative traction spreads rapidly on social media.

C.Negative traction often leads to legal action.


b-----When communicating with the media, it's important to...

A.Only answer the questions the media asks.

B.Include your own talking points.

C.Refuse to answer any questions the media asks.


c-----Which of the following is a useful question to ask yourself in order to drive the message in a press conference?

A.What impact will this have on the financials of the business?

B.What information should be withheld from the public?

C.What is going to be the headline tomorrow?


a-----Which of the following is a key quality of crises?

A.They are often unpredictable.

B.They typically cause minimal damage to the business.

C.They are usually easy to rectify.


c-----What is the primary goal of crisis communications?

A.To ensure the financial stability of the organization.

B.To generate feedback from stakeholders.

C.To maintain the reputation of the organization.


a-----When should you begin assembling a crisis communication team?

A.Well before a crisis happens.

B.As a crisis is happening.

C.After a crisis has been addressed.


a-----Which of the following should a spokesperson be taught to avoid?

A.Saying "no comment" to a question or remark.

B.Being too up front about what the organization is doing to respond to the crisis.

C.Admitting that a mistake was made.


c-----Which of the following primarily drives the choice of a notification system?

A.The level of adoption of the system in the industry.

B.The trustworthiness of the vendor.

C.The specific needs of the organization.


b-----Why is it important to include input from different departments and levels when conducting a vulnerability audit?

A.You are typically obligated to by law.

B.Not everyone has the same information that could be useful.

C.You need to ensure every employee is behaving as expected.


a-----Which of the following situations does a business continuity plan (BCP) respond to?

A.The organization's ability to conduct business as usual is diminished.

B.The organization has a downturn in sales over the last quarter.

C.The organization faces an ethical dilemma.


b-----Why is it important to distinguish a typical incident from a disaster?

A.A disaster cannot be easily recovered from, so the organization needs to know what to accept versus what to respond to.

B.A disaster may require more strategic methods of securing valuable assets.

C.A disaster requires legal involvement, whereas an incident does not.


a-----How can you take a proactive approach to incident response?

A.Discuss incident response early in the risk management process.

B.Address incidents as they happen.

C.Lock down key services so that they are not at risk of compromise.


b-----Which of the following principles are you upholding when you refuse to "pass the buck" when managing organizational reputation?

A.Fairness

B.Accountability

C.Explainability


a, c-----How can you leverage AI in your media communication plan? (Select two.)

A.Using AI to profile stakeholders.

B.Using AI to write the plan.

C.Using AI to predict media trends.


b-----Which of the following can result from a poor implementation of AI in a media communication plan?

A.AI that's too explainable.

B.AI that reinforces bias.

C.AI that can cause physical harm.


a-----Which of the following should a holding statement directly address?

A.Risks

B.Feedback

C.Ethics


b-----Which of the following AI techniques is most useful to an early warning system using social media?

A.Market segmentation

B.Sentiment analysis

C.Content filtering


b, c-----Which of the following principles do feedback and monitoring help promote? (Select two.)

A.Safety

B.Accountability

C.Transparency


a, b-----Which of the following should be avoided when communicating about a crisis? (Select two.)

A.Providing information about what you don't know.

B.Providing information about what you hope to be true.

C.Providing information that may put the organization in a bad light.


b-----Which of the following is a type of crisis that starts off small, then begins to grow into a larger crisis?

A.Sudden crisis

B.Smoldering crisis


a-----What does an ongoing relationship with the media often lead to?

A.Goodwill

B.Financial benefits

C.Reduced responsibility


b-----Why is it important to leverage social media influencers when communicating during a crisis?

A.Influencers can avoid responsibility for a crisis.

B.Influencers have a dedicated following.

C.Influencers can spin your message.


a-----Why is it important to prepare for long-term communication in emerging technology fields?

A.New risks will emerge in the future that need to be addressed.

B.Stakeholders will only trust communication that extends over large periods of time.

C.Emerging technologies are complex and take a long time to explain.


b-----How do you create an ethical organizational culture?

A.Top-down communication about company values.

B.Transparency about company values.

C.Having documents that describe the company's values.


b-----What does a leadership champion do?

A.Make decisions based on company values even in the face of adversity.

B.Make decisions based on their popularity.

C.Make decisions based on their personal opinions.


a, b, c-----What are the duties of an ethics board for data-driven technology organizations?

A.Respond to rapid changes in the field, investigating the ethical implications.

B.Develop resources to be used in ethical decision-making processes.

C.Build a a repository of institutional knowledge around ethical practices.


a-----How could a board of ethics be an example of ethics washing?

A.If it has no power to institute change.

B.If it has a wide variety of stakeholders.

C.If it has a narrow list of values to guide its decisions.


c-----How can the human resources department help build an ethical organizational culture?

A.Hiring candidates based on their leadership skills.

B.Hiring candidates based on their technical skills.

C.Hiring candidates based on their cultural fit.


b-----What is the purpose of change management in terms of creating an ethical organizational culture?

A.To create a management transition.

B.To create a smooth transition.

C.To create a fast transition through training.


a-----How is employee voice different than an open door policy?

A.Employee voice follows up with people to show how changes were implemented based on their communication. 

B.Open door policy follows up with people to show how changes were implemented based on their communication.


a, b, c-----What makes ethics training effective?

A.Keep sessions short and focused.

B.Keep sessions interactive.

C.Keep the content simple and direct.


b-----How is a culture building workshop different from ethics training?

A.Culture-building workshops teach the company values, while ethics training teaches people how to integrate company values into daily practice.

B.Culture-building workshops teaches people how to integrate company values into daily practice, while ethics training teaches the company values.


c-----What is a culture of appreciation?

A.An incentive structure that encourages managers to identify people who deserve a reward for behaving ethically.

B.An incentive structure that encourages external stakeholders to identify people who deserve a reward for behaving ethically.

C.An incentive structure that encourages all employees to identify people who deserve a reward for behaving ethically.


a-----Which approach to corporate governance is more likely to create an ethical organizational culture?

A.A systemic approach with incentive systems.

B.An oversight committee focused on rules.

C.A board focused on legal and regulatory compliance.


a-----An ethical impact assessment is 

A.Focused on preventing future problems.

B.Focused on the impact of past ethical risks.

C.Focused on identifying the causes of past errors.


b-----What is the purpose of what-if scenario planning sessions?

A.The purpose of what-if scenario planning sessions is to think critically about the tradeoffs between company values and business needs so you can decide how to proceed.

B.The purpose of what-if scenario planning sessions is to think critically about potential worst-case scenarios so you can decide whether or not to proceed with a project.

C.The purpose of what-if scenario planning sessions is to think critically about your mistakes so you can identify what you should do after your company has an ethical violation.


c-----Why is accountability an important principle to include in governance structures for data-driven technologies?

A.Accountability in governance structures encourages employees to put business needs first.

B.Accountability in governance structures encourages management to hold employees accountable for their actions.

C.Accountability in governance structures encourages all employees to feel responsible for building trustworthy systems.


a-----Why is fair competition an important ethical consideration for data-driven technology businesses?

A.Fair competition builds user trust in the technology as a whole.

B.Fair competition prevents predatory pricing.

C.Fair competition provides product/service choice to users.


a-----In the context of open data, what is FAIR? 

A.An acronym for findable, accessible, interoperable, and reusable.

B.An acronym for fundamental artificial intelligence research.

C.A reference to fair competition, which makes open data possible.


a-----What shared principle from ethical frameworks is intellectual property often at odds with?

A.Transparency/explainability

B.Safety/security

C.Privacy


a-----What is the ethical consequence of failing to follow legal and regulatory requirements?

A.A failure to follow them leads to a lack of stakeholder trust.

B.A failure to follow them leads to fines.

C.A failure to follow them leads to legal action.


a-----What shared principle from ethical frameworks is the primary reason for the consideration of human rights when building AI systems?

A.Fairness/non-discrimination

B.Privacy

C.Transparency


c-----How can we mitigate the economic and labor impacts of automation of jobs through AI systems?

A.Design AI systems that perform physical labor for humans, freeing them up to get higher-paying jobs based on the human ability to think.

B.Design AI systems that improve the quality of living.

C.Design AI systems that are decision aids for humans or otherwise complement human skills.


c-----What is the purpose of a code of ethics?

A.To provide rules to guide employee behavior.

B.To provide guidelines for legal and regulatory compliance.

C.To provide values to guide employee decision-making.


a, c-----Who does a code of ethics apply to?

A.Board of Directors

B.Users of the product or service

C.Employees


c-----What roles do stakeholders play in developing a code of ethics?

A.Authors

B.Regulators

C.Reviewers


a, b, c-----What are some ways to identify potential areas of concern?

A.Look at ethical mistakes or concerns discussed by other companies in the same domain.

B.Look at prior issues with your product or service.

C.Ask external users to interact with the product or service and discuss their ethical concerns.


a, b-----What are the proactive reasons to identify potential barriers to change in ethical practices during the development phase of a code of ethics?

A.To avoid throwing away the cost of implementation due to limited adoption.

B.To address the issues within the code itself.

C.To identify areas you need to monitor after the code is deployed.


b-----True or False? The reason you collect code of ethics samples from other companies is so that you don't have to draft your own.

A.True

B.False


b-----What style or tone is not recommended for a code of ethics?
A.Plain language

B.Formal legal language.

C.Prescriptive language


b, c-----How do you run a pilot program for a code of ethics?

A.Publish the code of ethics on your social media platforms and solicit feedback.

B.Have a set period for feedback and clear mechanisms for collecting feedback.

C.Stress test the code of ethics on a sandbox project.


b-----Who has the final approval of a code of ethics?

A.Legal and Compliance team

B.Board of Directors

C.The C-suite executives


c-----What is the best way to ensure your code of ethics is deployed successfully?

A.Make sure people know the consequences of non-compliance and have them sign the code of ethics.

B.Have a team dedicated to answering questions about the code of ethics.

C.Build policies and procedures that embed the code of ethics into day to day practices.


a-----How are policies and procedures connected?

A.Procedures provide the concrete steps to make policies practical.

B.Policies provide the concrete steps to make procedures practical.


b, c-----What is a policy owner?

A.The person who will track policy violations.

B.The lead developer of the policy.

C.The liaison with internal and external stakeholders.


a-----What makes a policy understandable to employees?

A.Simple familiar language

B.Arcane verbiage

C.Hard to parse sentences


a-----Why should you consult external stakeholders when developing a ethics policy?

A.To ensure their values are represented, in case they are different than the values of the product development team.

B.To ensure they believe the company is ethical.

C.To ensure they will follow the policy guidelines.


a, c-----What should you document before publishing a new policy?

A.Any open issues that are being deferred to the next policy refresh.

B.Any resolved issues from the development.

C.Any assumptions made during policy development.


b-----Which asset will best ensure procedures are followed?

A.Reporting mechanism

B.Toolkits and training on the tools

C.Clear communication channels


c-----What is the most important element to ensure a successful policy implementation?

A.An announcement that the policy has been released.

B.A dedicated contact person to answer questions.

C.Simple, easy to follow examples how the policy works in practice.


a, b-----When should policies be refreshed?

A.On a regular cadence, such as yearly.

B.When there are dramatic changes in the product or service capabilities.

C.After an ethics violation.


b, c-----Which of these descriptors best characterizes surveys? (Choose two).

A.Hard to scale

B.Scalable

C.Easy to analyze due to the standardized questions and responses.

D.Allows for most in-depth information gathering.


b, c-----How can ensure tracking severity of ethics violations is objective and consistent?

A.Have a single person do the tracking.

B.Use an internal system with a limited set of menu options defined by a group of internal and external stakeholders.

C.Use risk matrices like those used in cybersecurity.


a-----You can find practice questions in which of the following places?

A.In the summative assessments section of the Coursera course.

B.In the candidate handbook.


b-----Exam questions are developed by whom?

A.The ANSI National Accreditation Board

B.Industry experts

C.CertNexus employees


c-----The Coursera Professional Certificate is which type of certificate?

A.Certificate of Apprenticeship

B.Completion Certificate

C.Assessment Based Certificate


a-----Certifications can be revoked

A.True

B.False


c-----The name you enter when setting up your PearsonVUE account should be which of the following?

A.Your name as it appears on your CV or resume.

B.Your nickname which you prefer to be called. 

C.Your name as it appears on the identification you will use on the day of the exam.


a-----You will be able to find out what to have available on the day of exam in which of the following?

A.The CertNexus Policies agreement

B.The PearsonVUE Privacy and Cookies Polic


b-----The following are allowed during your online exam.

A.Public spaces such as a cafe or library. 

B.Clean desk with no interruptions. 

C.Leaving to take a bathroom break.


d-----As part of the check in process at the testing center you will be requested to do which of the following? 

A.Remove your glasses for inspection

B.Stow away all personal items.

C.Roll up your sleeves.

D.All of the above


a, b-----What evidence could you provide to your Accredible badge profile?

A.Projects and honors projects completed in the Coursera Course.

B.Academic paper in the subject area you are certified.

C.Profile photo


a-----Why is explainability important in AI systems? 

A.It enables us to trust the decisions that the AI makes.

B.It enables us to tinker with the AI to make it perform better.

C.It enables us to communicate the results of an AI to managers and other executives.


b-----Which of the following defines the AI black box problem? 

A. A dangerous machine intelligence put in a digital prison
B. The challenge of understanding the inner workings of opaque systems
C. Not being able to know how something crashed or failed
D. Machine intelligence making something illusory, like pulling a rabbit from a hat


b, d-----Which of the following elements are important aspects of ethical integrity with regards to data? (Select two.) 

A. What type of data (audio, visual, etc.) is being collected and/or utilized.
B. If the holders of data are trustworthy entities.
C. If the data is commercially viable or monetarily valuable.
D. Whether the data was gathered in an ethical manner.


b, d-----Which of the following best describes why data is sometimes compared to oil? (Select two.)

A. Data can be easily monopolized.
B. Data can fuel algorithmic technologies.
C. Data can damage the environment.
D. Data can be monetarily valuable.


b-----At what point should ethical consideration ideally be applied to emerging technologies? 

A. During periodic reviews, with ongoing customer feedback solicited.
B. From its inception, through maintenance, to applying foresight regarding its decommissioning.
C. Upon delivery, with appropriate warranties where necessary.
D. Once an ethical issue has received negative feedback in public media.


c-----Which of the following describes dual-use or multipurpose data? 

A. Data that can be transformed into multiple forms, e.g. extracting audio from a video file.
B. Data that can be used in multiple devices or formats, such as a video on a Smart TV, tablet, and computer.
C. Data collected for one application that could also be applied to another application in a different domain.
D. Data that can be easily shared with a partner or family member for mutual enjoyment.


b, d-----Which of the following are important ethical elements to safeguard within ethical AI systems? (Select two.)

A. Performance and optimization.
B. Accountability and management of bias.
C. The number of layers, tensors, or parameters used in a model.
D. Transparency and explainability, balanced with privacy.


d-----Which of the following is the generally agreed upon current state of the art of AI? 

A. Superintelligence
B. Strong AI 
C. Perceptrons
D. Narrow AI


a, d-----Which of the following describe important aspects of why emerging technologies are so capable and powerful? (Select two.)

A. They can automate very complex operations.
B. They are exciting and captivating to many people.
C. They can displace workers by performing their jobs more efficiently. 
D. They may be able to self-improve by learning from data.


a, c-----Management asks someone to do a data-related task. Which of the following would likely be ethically problematic? (Select two.)

A. Manipulate data or alter its interpretation.
B. Change data to another format.
C. Delete any erroneous data.
D. Aggregate data together.


c, d-----Which of the following describe important aspects in the role of an ethical AI engineer? (Select two.)

A. Writing new equations to express intelligence.
B. Building and maintaining computational hardware.
C. Cleaning and sorting data, and auditing for bias.
D. Keeping up with the latest developments and vulnerabilities.


a-----Which of the following, by itself, qualifies as personally identifiable information (PII)?

A. A user's home address
B. Temperature readings for an office building
C. System events added to a log
D. A user's customer ID in an online ordering system


c-----Why are groups like race and religion considered protected classes?

A. Organizations are legally not allowed to collect information about these groups.
B. These groups can be used to personally identify someone.
C. These groups have been used as the basis for wholesale discrimination.
D. People use these groups as the basis for their identities.


c-----Which of the following describes an opt-out policy in regards to the collection of private data?

A. Data about the user is never collected, regardless of the user's consent.
B. Data about that user isn't collected until that user explicitly states you are allowed to.
C. Data about the user is automatically collected unless that user explicitly states that you should not do so.
D. Data about the user is always collected, regardless of the user's consent.


a, b-----Which of the following are key principles of privacy by design? (Select two.)

A. Organizations must incorporate privacy protections throughout the project lifecycle.
B. Organizations must be proactive in protecting against privacy risks, not reactive.
C. Organizations must not expose the operational practices and technologies used to protect user privacy.
D. Organizations must keep the focus of privacy protections on the business rather than the user.


d-----What is the purpose of differential privacy?

A. To only allow certain parties to access certain portions of the data.
B. To remove the direct identifiers that can be used to identify individuals.
C. To ensure the data is completely confidential and cannot be read by unauthorized parties.
D. To enable parties to share private data without revealing individuals represented in the data.


c-----Which of the following describes the concept of liability?

A. Taking ownership of an assigned task.
B. Answering for one's actions to an authority figure.
C. The legal responsibility for one's actions.
D. The moral duty one has to take action.


b-----What does it mean to call a click-through agreement a "contract of adhesion"?

A. Both parties are legally bound by the agreement.
B. One party is forced into a "take-it-or-leave-it" situation.
C. Both parties are equally responsible for ensuring the agreement is adhered to.
D. One party is forced into using the service after agreeing.


c-----Which of the following is a type of technology contract that establishes the goals of both parties and describes how those goals will be achieved?

A. Terms of Service (ToS)
B. Software as a Service (SaaS)
C. Service-level agreement (SLA)
D. End-user license agreement (EULA)


c-----How does a smart contract differ from a traditional contract?

A. Smart contracts serve a different purpose than traditional contracts.
B. Smart contracts guarantee that all parties are anonymous.
C. Smart contracts eliminate the need for a central authority.
D. Smart contracts are more effective than traditional contracts.


c-----How can a visual contract be easier to understand than a written contract?

A. The use of pictures without any text makes it easier for most people to comprehend the details of a contract.
B. The use of pictures is more accessible to all people, whereas a written contract may be difficult for someone with a reading disability to understand.
C. The use of pictures with simple text makes it easier for the layperson to understand the details of a contract.
D. The use of pictures explains the contract in greater detail than a written contract, making it easier for anyone to understand the particulars.


b-----What causes bias?

A. Bias is caused by the media.
B. Biases are learned from our families, our social groups, and the media.
C. Biases are caused by the opinions of our families.
D. Bias is biological, we are born with it.


b-----What is the fundamental attribution error?

A. When you incorrectly assume a cause and effect relationship for two correlated variables.
B. When you say your bad behavior is caused by the situation, but when other people display the same bad behavior, it is caused by a personality trait.
C. When you believe your ideas are normal and that the majority of people agree with you.
D. When you believe your chances of experiencing something negative are lower and your chances of experiencing something positive are higher than others.


b, c, d-----Which of the following are actions that can help combat implicit bias? (Select three.)

A. Obtaining your information from the same one or two media sources that your family and friends access.
B. Exposing yourself to "counter-stereotypical" examples.
C. Interacting with diverse groups of people.
D. Cultivating awareness of your own biases.
E. Surrounding yourself with others who have similar experiences.


c-----When conducting an opinion poll, which of the following biases do you need to guard against the most when collecting your data?

A. Modeling bias
B. Misclassification bias
C. Sampling bias 
D. Correlation bias


c-----Which of the following is an example of a cognitive bias?

A. Misclassification bias
B. Modeling bias
C. Anchoring bias 
D. Correlation bias


c-----Are criminal justice risk assessments race-neutral?

A. Yes, technology in itself is not racist.
B. No, it is designed with intention to be unfair. 
C. No, the data is biased as it reflects historical bias.
D. Yes, algorithms replace human judgement and they are unbiased.


b-----Which type of bias causes people to trust an automated decision-making system (ADS) over a human's decision?

A. Confirmation bias
B. Automation bias 
C. Implicit bias
D. Complacency bias


a, c-----How can confirmation bias impact us socially? (Select two.)

A. It can impede socio-political cooperation.
B. It can lead to a diverse set of friends.
C. It can lead to groupthink, which can in turn halt forward progress.
D. It can prevent us from being social with other people.


c-----Which of the following describes an illusory-correlation bias?

A. When you correlate a variable with a confounding variable.
B. When you correlate variables that do not exist in your data set.
C. When you incorrectly assume a cause and effect relationship because two variables are correlated.
D. When you incorrectly assume a correlation because there is an illusory confounding variable.


a-----Which of the following is one explanation for why cognitive biases exist?

A. We receive too much information and are overloaded.
B. They are taught to us in school.
C. We use them to help remember things.
D. They help us think logically instead of emotionally.


a-----Which of the following is a formative ethics theory that states that maximizing happiness is the primary standard for determining what is right or wrong?

A. Utilitarianism 
B. Virtue ethics
C. Categorical imperative
D. Deontology


a, b, d-----Which of the following statements are promoted by the categorical imperative? (Select three.)

A. Each person must use reason to will moral laws.
B. Don't treat people as a means to an end; treat them always as an end.
C. You have a moral duty to choose your actions based on their potential outcomes. 
D. Act in such a way that your actions may become a universal law.


d-----Which of the following statements accurately describes the philosophical concept of predeterminism?

A. All future events are determined by preceding events, as in a chain, but human beings may still be able to interfere with this chain of events.
B. All events are predestined to happen by a supernatural force.
C. Human beings are able to make choices whose outcomes are not already determined.
D. All events, past, present, and future, are determined in advance.


b-----How do norms differ from morals?

A. Norms are universal to all cultures; morals are not.
B. Morals involve value judgments; norms do not.
C. Morals are collective; norms are more personal.
D. Norms form the basis for morals.


a, d-----Which of the following are consequences of saying that someone or something has moral agency? (Select two.)

A. The moral agent can be held responsible for their actions.
B. The moral agent follows a deontological code of ethics.
C. The moral agent acts in a morally correct manner.
D. The moral agent is capable of determining right and wrong.


b-----Why is deciding how to act using moral reasoning not always a feasible goal for human beings?

A. Moral reasoning has few tangible benefits for most people.
B. Human decision making is often influenced by emotion and not logic.
C. Moral reasoning is too complicated to apply to a real-world situation.
D. Most people are not educated on normative ethical theories and therefore cannot perform true moral reasoning.


b, c-----Which of the following statements are true regarding the purpose of moral psychology? (Select two.)

A. Moral psychology seeks to understand what the best way to act morally is.
B. Moral psychology seeks to understand how the human mind develops morality.
C. Moral psychology seeks to understand why people act morally or immorally.
D. Moral psychology seeks to understand the nature of what it means to be moral.


a-----Which of the following is an example of applied ethics?

A. Professional ethics
B. Pluralism
C. Moral relativism
D. Virtue ethics


b-----Your organization has developed an AI system that recommends treatments for hospital patients. Some questions have been raised about the ethics of how these treatments are determined. What applied ethics domain do these concerns fall under?

A. Environmental ethics
B. Bioethics 
C. Business ethics
D. Engineering ethics


a, c-----What does it mean to say that human rights are inalienable? (Select two.)

A. Inalienable rights cannot be taken away except in extreme circumstances.
B. Inalienable rights are conditional.
C. Inalienable rights are inherent in all human beings.
D. Inalienable rights are derived from tradition.


a-----What does "ethics by design" mean?

A. An approach in which ethics is considered from the initial design stage. 
B. A reference to the framework set forth by IEEE's Ethically Aligned Design.
C. A creative design approach as the focus for ethics.
D. A reference to one of the tenets of engineering activism.


d-----Which of the following describes why explainability is important?

A. It enables you to explain a system for shareholder purposes.
B. It is necessary so that internal stakeholders can understand how a system works.
C. It provides interpretations of a system's actions.
D. It provides accountability and trust.


b-----Which of the following describes personhood?

A. Personhood is an individual's right to freedom. 
B. Personhood is often used to dictate how something is treated. 
C. Personhood is the legal protection provided to AI systems.
D. Personhood is a concept that applies to narrow AI.


b, c, d-----Which of the following describe how adopting ethical practices can be a strategic differentiator? (Select three.)

A. It will ensure you comply with regulations.
B. It will build customer trust.
C. It will support the development of strategic partnerships.
D. It will encourage applicants to apply for your company.
E.It will reduce your business obligations toward customers and business partners.


a-----Which of the following best describes beneficence?

A. Beneficence is the promotion of well-being, not just for moral agents like humans, but of animals, the environment, and societies.
B. Beneficence is a term coined by IBM that relates to their Green Horizons initiative in 2014.
C. Beneficence is the promotion of efficient systems that perform rapidly and benefit companies.
D. Beneficence is the promotion of well-being for moral agents like humans.


a-----What is the difference between beneficence and non-maleficence?

A. Beneficence refers to "do only good" and non-maleficence refers to "do no harm."
B. Non-maleficence refers only to malevolent artificial general intelligence (AGI), while beneficence can refer to any "good" emerging technology.
C. Beneficence is a less important goal for the field of AI than non-maleficence.
D. Beneficence and non-maleficence are quite similar and often interchangeable.


a, d-----Which of the following are valid concerns regarding electronic personalities? (Select two.) 

A. That they would create unfair advantages, as not everyone has access to the same rights.
B. That individuals would start applying for electronic personalities.
C. That they will make it more difficult to access information.
D. That they would absolve manufacturers of liability.


a, c-----Which of the following are ways to participate in engineering activism? (Select two.)
 
A. Follow a code of ethics.
B. Perform all tasks required of you.
C. Engage with the public.
D. Follow ethics by design.


b-----How can AI uphold justice?

A. The more AI-based products being used in the justice system, the more justice can be upheld.
B. AI systems can be designed from the start to help promote fairness and minimize bias.
C. AI systems can replace human judges, who are often biased.
D. AI can automate many of the clerical tasks involved in the justice system.


a, b-----Which of the following are examples of how AI can limit human autonomy? (Select two.)

A. Weapon systems can limit human autonomy as humans may not have decision-making capability or understand the decision making.
B. AI systems might impact certain vulnerable groups such as the elderly and children differently than the rest of the population, which could limit those groups' autonomy.
C. AI systems can assist individuals with automated, repetitive, or dangerous tasks.
D. AI systems can perform tasks that humans cannot, such as processing millions of data records in a matter of seconds.


a-----Which school of philosophical thought primarily advocates for the greatest good for the greatest amount of people? 

A. Utilitarianism 
B. Kantian ethics
C. Virtue ethics
D. Deontology


a-----Which type of entity are the OECD Principles on Artificial Intelligence mostly geared towards?

A. National governments 
B. Individuals
C. Municipal governments
D. Private corporations


c-----Which of the following principles are most commonly cited in AI-based ethical frameworks?

A. Happiness and spiritual contentment
B. Human control and autonomy
C. Transparency and explainability 
D. Fairness and non-discrimination


c-----Which of the following frameworks primarily promotes human rights?

A. The Beijing AI Principles
B. The Asilomar AI Principles
C. The Toronto Declaration 
D. The Montreal Declaration


a-----Which of the following best describes capability caution as referenced in the Asilomar AI Principles?

A. Given a lack of consensus, we should avoid strong assumptions regarding upper limits on future AI capabilities.
B. If there is no understanding of the internal mechanisms of AI, then AI development should be halted.
C. We should keep limits on on what artificial general intelligence (AGI) is capable of.
D. Should there be a greater reliance on AI, measures should be taken to ensure that humans are still capable of finding work.


a-----Which of the following describes the principle of transparency in the context of AI systems?

A. Transparency enables human observers to see inside the decision-making process of an AI system.
B. Transparency enables human observers to reproduce the decision-making process of an AI system.
C. Transparency enables human observers to tweak the decision-making process of an AI system.
D. Transparency enables human observers to understand the decision-making process of an AI system.


d-----Which of the following is a case study that best represents the principle of professional responsibility?

A. The Beijing AI Principles' tenets about the use of AI
B. The IEEE Ethically Aligned Design's discussion on classical ethics
C. The Asilomar AI Principles' definition of capability caution
D. The American Medical Association's definition of AI as augmented intelligence


d-----If you are attempting to build a new framework for the research and development (R&D) of AI, which of the following frameworks might you look at first for its emphasis in this area?

A. The American Medical Association's definition of artificial intelligence
B. The Montreal Declaration for a Responsible Development of Artificial Intelligence
C. The G20 AI Principles
D. The Beijing AI Principles


b-----In AI, the principle of privacy is most commonly referred to in the context of which of the following concepts? 

A. Human control
B. Data protection 
C. Personal protection
D. Transparency


b-----Which of the following describes an ethical framework?

A. Ethical frameworks consolidate regulatory requirements for an industry.
B. Ethical frameworks seek to mitigate ethical concerns by creating actionable steps.
C. Ethical frameworks apply meta-ethical theories to everyday business operations.
D. Ethical frameworks raise timeless ethical questions that are not easily put into action.


d-----Why does the trolley problem pose an ethical predicament?

A. You as the actor don't have sufficient control over the circumstance.
B. The moral responsibility is split between you and the person controlling the trolley.
C. There are so many potential outcomes that it becomes difficult to choose one that is most ethical.
D. You have to make a choice between two scenarios where choosing one leads to loss of life in the other.


b, c-----Which of the following ethical considerations should have priority in an emergency situation like the use of contact-tracing solutions during a pandemic? (Select two.)

A. Bias
B. Accountability 
C. Privacy 
D. Explainability


b-----In using AI-enabled solutions within the context of medical imaging analysis, which of the following is the most important ethical consideration?

A. Privacy
B. Explainability 
C. Bias
D. Security


c-----If an AI-enabled system enables addictive behavior, which of the following makes for the most compelling argument to stop development work on that system?

A. There is a lack of accountability on the part of the user since they overuse the service.
B. The user will share more data with the system because of increased use.
C. The system, as designed, acts counter to the well-being of the users.
D. The process for obtaining consent has not been made transparent to the user.


b-----Why do smart toys raise additional ethical concerns over those that are raised in the course of other products and services that use AI?

A. They are used in the privacy of homes rather than in public settings, like other products or services.
B. Children are more susceptible to manipulation and therefore need extra protective measures.
C. It is difficult to obtain informed consent for the use of the smart toy. 
D. The smart toys store personal data on the device, which can be stolen.


a-----Which of the following software development principles is essential in the real-world deployment of AI-enabled software applications in critical scenarios like self-driving cars?

A. Robustness to adversarial examples 
B. Version control of the AI models deployed 
C. Architectural design analysis 
D. Continuous integration and deployment of patch updates


c-----Which of the following is the most important argument in favor of content moderation in online platforms? 

A. It helps uphold freedom of expression for everyone and doesn't give anyone special rights.
B. It prevents the development of monopolies in terms of content creators. 
C. It prevents the spread of disinformation that can cause harm to vulnerable populations.
D. It creates adequate incentives for everyone to share their opinions.


d-----Why is the question of robot rights and emancipation one that isn't as important as addressing issues of bias, privacy, transparency, and other principles discussed in the various ethical frameworks?
A.Humans are anthropocentric and don't want to extend rights to other sentient entities.
B. There is no legal precedent for granting rights to entities that are not humans.
C. Robots are mechanical instruments and therefore don't deserve to have rights. 
D. These rights necessitate that robots become sentient entities, which is currently not feasible.


a-----Which of the following is the most important ethical consideration regarding technical developments like deepfakes? 

A. They usurp a person's likeness and can then be weaponized against them.
B. They take away monetization opportunities, leaving individuals unfairly compensated for their data.
C. They are built on technological progress made by a third-party organization.
D. They violate data sharing agreements in many jurisdictions.


c-----Why are anonymization and pseudonymization insufficient protection measures against breaches of data privacy and security? 

A. They don't integrate well into data science and machine learning workflows.
B. They only work in scenarios with particular kinds of personal information. 
C. They can be broken by combining this data with other publicly available data. 
D. They destroy the usefulness of the data.


a, d-----Which of the following are ways that regulations differ from ethical frameworks? (Select two.)

A. Regulations have legal enforcement behind them.
B. Regulations are often industry led.
C. Regulations are flexible in their implementation.
D. Regulations provide a clear basis for potential litigation.


c-----Your business handles the personal data of California residents. Which of the following regulations would enable a resident to request that their data be deleted from your company's files?

A. COPPA
B. OECD Privacy Guidelines
C. CCPA 
D. PCI DSS


a, b-----Which of the following does the Brazilian General Data Protection Act (LGPD) mandate? (Select two.)

A. Data protection impact assessments 
B. Data protection officers 
C. Data protection audits
D. Data protection analysts


a-----Which of the following is a standard or regulation that focuses on ensuring the implementation of strong cybersecurity techniques like network security and cryptography to protect data?

A. PCI DSS 
B. POPI
C. PIPEDA
D. FERPA


c, d-----Which of the following are requirements set forth by the Biometric Information Privacy Act (BIPA)? (Select two.)

A. Organizations must store biometric data in local, on-premises databases.
B. Organizations must not transmit biometric data across an unsecured network like the Internet.
C. Organizations must obtain consent from individuals regarding the collection and use of biometric data. 
D. Organizations must destroy biometric data in a timely fashion.


d-----The Children's Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA) safeguards the privacy of which age group's personal information? 

A. Anyone between 5 and 13 years old
B. Anyone under 18 years old
C. Anyone between 13 and 18 years old
D. Anyone under 13 years old


b, d-----Which of the following are advantages to adopting standards frameworks like ISO 27000? (Select two.)

A. Regulatory weight and legal enforcement
B. Formal certification processes that provide competitive advantage 
C. Technology-specific focus and precise implementation instructions
D. International support, recognition, and involvement


b-----Which of the following is a notable aspect of the Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act (PIPEDA) when compared to similar laws and regulations?

A. Its exclusive focus on a single domain rather than a breadth of domains
B. A stipulation to continue providing service even if data usage is denied 
C. Its nationwide scope and specific national focus
D. The early date of its inauguration


d-----Which of the following resources does the National Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST) provide to organizations?

A. Industrial configurations
B. Security tools
C. Measurement technologies
D. Reference materials


b, d-----Which of the following ethical domains does the IEEE 7000 series explore? (Select two.)

A. Fair competition
B. Emulated empathy 
C. Personnel safety
D. Machine-readable privacy terms


a, b-----Which of the following are important elements of the data minimization principle? (Select two.)

A. Only collect data that is strictly necessary 
B. Only keep data for as long as it is needed 
C. Only compress data that needs to be kept as small as possible
D. Only delete data that can be easily replaced


b, d-----Which of the following are logical arguments in favor of an organization maintaining compliance? (Select two.)

A. Reduced costs of development
B. Avoidance of reputational damage 
C. Reduced time to deployment
D. Long-term cost savings due to avoiding fines


c-----How does increasing AI performance often conflict with the desire for explainability?

A. Increasing AI performance sometimes removes human-in-the-loop (HITL) methods, making it more difficult to explain decision-making processes.
B. Increasing AI performance sometimes reduces the transparency of input data used in training, making it more difficult to explain decision-making processes.
C. Increasing AI performance sometimes leads to greater model complexity, making it more difficult to explain decision-making processes. 
D. Increasing AI performance sometimes leads to certain evaluation metrics no longer being useful, making it more difficult to explain decision-making processes.


c-----Which of the following explains why efficiency can sometimes incur systemic fragility?

A. Increased efficiency tends to compound over time
B. Increased efficiency tends to create cost savings
C. Efficiency benefits may lead to complex second-order costs 
D. High-efficiency machines often require more maintenance


b, c-----Which of the following are possible benefits of a human-in-the-loop (HITL) architecture? (Select two.)

A. Eliminating the potential for human error in decision making
B. Mitigating excessive scope or potential collateral damage 
C. Balancing the negative effects of an AI system on people with the effects on environments and objects 
D. Improving the speed of autonomous decision making


d-----How does the "virtuous cycle" that benefits Big Tech operate?

A. Organizations write algorithms with fewer biases, which leads to fairer outcomes.
B. By acting virtuous, the public respects Big Tech more and more.
C. Better classes of customers lead to richer and more refined data for algorithmic systems.
D. Data-driven algorithms improve solutions, leading to new customers, and better data.


d-----Which of the following is often in opposition to moral relativism?

A. Subjective perspectives
B. Customs and conventions
C. Cultural mores
D. Evidence-based policy


b, d-----Which of the following are important aspects of resolving complex and confounding business pressures? (Select two.)

A. Assuring everyone that their desires can be accommodated without compromise
B. Engaging with multiple stakeholders to understand their particular needs 
C. Prioritizing ethical and safety concerns over business desires in all cases and situations
D. Managing expectations that not everyone can get what they want, when they want it


a, d-----You plan on streamlining your company's product experience, but you also want to uphold the agency and autonomy of your users. Which of the following actions would uphold these principles? (Select two.)

A. Respecting the right of the user to choose and customize their experiences 
B. Applying machine intelligence to simulate customer behavior
C. Enabling government agencies to have a personalized interface with software
D. Refraining from guiding users into something they didn't wish for or intend


b, d-----Which of the following describe corporate hegemony? (Select two.)

A. Spending large sums on corporate branding and marketing
B. Consolidating interests through mergers and acquisitions 
C. Making multiple investments in a similar space to improve the outcomes of success
D. Locking out smaller players, leading to monopolies or cartels


a, c, e-----Which of the following are tasks in the overall risk management process? (Select three.)

A. Mitigation 
B. Deployment
C. Analysis 
D. Elimination
E. Identification


b, c-----Which of the following risk analysis methods use words like "likely," "unlikely," and "rare" to describe the likelihood of risk, and words like "low," "medium," and "high" to describe the impact of risk? (Select two.)

A. Quantitative analysis
B. Semi-quantitative analysis 
C. Qualitative analysis 
D. Semi-qualitative analysis


b-----Which of the following is not a valid risk response technique?

A. Avoid
B. Ignore 
C. Transfer
D. Accept


b, d-----Which of the following statements are correct about a variable that is normally distributed? (Select two.)

A. Less than half of all measurements fall within one standard deviation of the mean.
B. The variable's distribution, when graphed, exhibits a symmetrical bell shape. 
C. The tails of a normal distribution are denser than the center.
D. The mean, median, and mode of all measurements is the same, and all are located at the center of the distribution.


a-----Which of the following statements accurately describes variance?

A. Variance measures how far a data example is from the mean.
B. Variance measures the shape of the tails in a distribution relative to the center.
C. Variance measures the error between predicted values and actual values.
D. Variance measures how much a variable's distribution differs from a normal distribution.


d-----In the following scatter plot, the GrossIncome variable is plotted against the Revenue variable. What type of correlation does this plot suggest?

A. There is a strong negative correlation between both variables.
B. There is a weak positive correlation between both variables.
C. There is a weak negative correlation between both variables.
D. There is a strong positive correlation between both variables.


d-----How do AI and other data-driven technologies use probability?

A. By estimating the likelihood of some event happening without input data
B. By guaranteeing that some event will occur with 100% likelihood
C. By determining the objective likelihood of some event happening
D. By providing a model of belief about the likelihood of some event happening


d-----You have a dataset of customers that includes each customer's gender, location, and other personal attributes. The label you are trying to predict is how much sales revenue each customer is likely to generate for the business based on these attributes. What type of machine learning outcome is this problem suited for?

A. Classification
B. Dimensionality reduction
C. Clustering
D. Regression


d-----You're training a model to classify whether or not a bridge is likely to collapse given several factors. You have a dataset of thousands of existing bridges and their attributes, where each bridge is labeled as having collapsed or not collapsed. Only a handful of bridges in the dataset are labeled as having collapsed—the rest are labeled as not collapsed. Given your goal of minimizing bridge collapse and the severe harm it can cause, which of the following metrics would be most useful for evaluating the model?

A. Precision
B. Confusion matrix
C. Accuracy
D. Recall


d-----Which of the following metrics is used to evaluate a linear regression machine learning model?

A. Accuracy
B. Goodhart's Law
C. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC)
D. Cost function


c-----Which of the following best describes a marketing persona?

A. An individual who assists with the activity of marketing
B. The emotional impression that a customer has about a product or category of goods
C. A description of a type of character based upon demographics, habits, and interests 
D. A character that encapsulates a brand's personality


d-----Which of the following best describes the use case for zero-knowledge protocols (ZKPs)?

A. Being made aware of when the battery in a product is past its zero point
B. Choosing what to do when you have zero knowledge of a subject
C. Handling divide-by-zero errors in computing software
D. Proving that something exists, but not the specifics


b, d-----Which of the following elements constitute PII? (Select two.)

A. Cookies and tokens
B. Passport numbers 
C. Device IDs
D. Telephone numbers


c, d-----Which of the following elements should be communicated with end users when negotiating ethical access to a user's data? (Select two.)

A. The monetary value of that data
B. An offer of money or other incentives to relinquish user's rights
C. The intention behind a certain activity or request 
D. A request for consent to perform an action


b-----Which of the following describes the technique of homomorphic encryption?

A. A method of cryptography that hides data inside other data.
B. A method of performing operations on encrypted data. 
C. A method of swapping public and private keys between hosts.
D. A method of mitigating biased algorithms through enhanced secrecy.


b, c-----Which of the following describe aspects of secondary data usage that might increase ethical risks? (Select two.)

A. Secondary data may be more expensive
B. Data applied to secondary purposes may expose private aspects or diminish personal dignity 
C. Additional organizations and processors may now have access to the data 
D. Encryption of data makes it harder to process


a, d-----Which of the following provide a user with more meaningful choices regarding how their data is being used? (Select two.)

A. Opt-out/opt-in mechanisms 
B. Whether the data is used by a person of a certain gender
C. The format that the data is stored in
D. Granular or modular control over data usage


a, c-----Which of the following refer to legal regulations or industry frameworks for protecting data? (Select two.)

A. NIST Privacy Framework 
B. ISO 9000
C. HIPAA 
D. CE mark


b, c-----Which of the following are prerequisites for high-level digital security and trust mechanisms? (Select two.)

A. Kindness
B. Authentication 
C. Authorization 
D. Reputation


a, d-----Which of the following describe a process of cross-correlation of data? (Select two.)

A. Discovering new information via inference 
B. Comparing people of different demographic groups
C. Analysing an individual's emotional stimulus and response patterns
D. Comparing multiple data points or sets


d-----What does the acronym RACI stand for?

A. Redesignable, Accessible, Collected, Informative
B. Relatable, Agreeable, Commendable, Irascible
C. Responsible, Accessible, Consulted, Improvised
D. Responsible, Accountable, Consulted, Informed


b-----Which of the following describes extrajudicial judgment?

A. Applying law from one jurisdiction within another.
B. A ruling or scoring made outside of a court.
C. Unusual interpretation of law outside of its typical meaning.
D. Transferring defendants from one jurisdiction to another for trial.


c, d-----Which of the following elements might be considered moderately affected in an Impact Level 2 Algorithmic Impact Assessment? (Select two.)

A. A brief delay in the conveyance of a commercial transaction.
B. A loss of life resulting from specific circumstances.
C. The health and well-being of individuals or communities.
D. The rights of individuals or communities.


a-----Which of the following describes automation bias?

A. Bias of people towards overly trusting in automation.
B. Bias that is subconscious, committed during a state of automata.
C. Bias enabled or perpetuated by machine learning.
D. Bias against automation by people worried about their jobs.


a, c-----Which of the following are likely benefits of having defined organizational policies? (Select two.)

A. It supports consistency of behavior and unification of culture.
B. It supports improved sales and marketing results.
C. It supports accountability and makes it more explicit.
D. It supports profitable research innovations and intellectual property.


a-----How might a non-stochastic decision tree be considered a black box algorithm?

A. If the model is far too complex to be readily understood by human beings.
B. If the model is expressed in an annotated visual form.
C. If the algorithm serves as part of a data recorder.
D. If the algorithm is contained within an embedded system.


b, d-----Which of the following are potential ethical benefits of conducting pilot testing prior to the release of emerging technologies? (Select two.)

A. It certifies that a product's developers are legally accountable.
B. It reveals any gaps in accountability or auditability.
C. It demonstrates that the system is functional as early as possible in order to satisfy senior management and investor stakeholders.
D. It minimizes the impact of any ethical issues which may emerge.


b, c-----Which of the following are important steps to document during an auditing process? (Select two.)

A. Provide significant advance notice before an audit.
B. Specify and document what precisely is being audited.
C. Document the audit procedures to be followed.
D. Specify a purpose for the audit or an agenda to be covered.


c, d-----Which of the following are common key performance indicators (KPIs) within dashboards of data-driven systems? (Select two.)

A. Earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation, and amortization (EBITDA)
B. Operating cashflow forecast
C. Model training time 
D. Performance metrics, such as accuracy and cost functions


c, d-----Which of the following are likely examples of a leverageable third party data-driven or data-related product? (Select two.)

A. Product design lifecycle
B. Management oversight
C. Data annotation and augmentation tools 
D. Compiled models


b-----Which of the following is an explainability risk of self-learning models?

A. Self-learning models can corrupt data or otherwise make it unreadable.
B. Self-learning models may introduce new data you're unaware of.
C. Self-learning models are unable to generate decisions as output.
D. Self-learning models are black boxes whose decisions cannot be understood.


a-----Which of the following is a transparency risk of closed source software?

A. Closed source software may not be accessible to independent auditors.
B. Closed source software includes obfuscated code that cannot be read by a human.
C. Closed source software cannot be reviewed by the organization that developed it.
D. Closed source software cannot be shared with business partners.


c-----A disruptive user on a social media site is subjected to a shadow ban. Which of the following might be an indication of that shadow ban?

A. A user logs in one day to find that they have been asked to discontinue their disruptive behavior, or they will be banned.
B. A user logs in one day to find a message from a site administrator saying that the user has been banned.
C. A user logs in one day to find that they are able to post, but receive no direct responses.
D. A user logs in one day to find that their posting privileges have been revoked.


a-----Which of the following is an effort to turn black box AI models into models whose decisions are easier to understand?

A. Explainable AI 
B. Self-learning models
C. Human-in-the-loop
D. Neural networks


d-----You want to solicit feedback from users who are seeking explanations about your AI products and services. So, you decide to place a form on your marketing website that users can fill out. Which of the following is the best way to structure that form for the purpose of collecting useful feedback?

A. Provide a series of open questions with a single-line entry field where users can provide short answers.
B. Provide a drop-down menu of feedback categories that users can select from, with a promise that you'll follow up via email.
C. Provide a series of yes or no questions with radio buttons where users select their respective answers.
D. Provide a large, unrestricted text box where users can enter their thoughts at length.


c-----You're the recipient of some data collected by a third party that you'll use in training an AI model. As per your business agreement, the third-party discloser of the data requests that you explain how you plan to use the data. At what point in the process should you provide this explanation?

A. At the point of training the model.
B. At the point of planning the AI system.
C. At the point of collecting the data.
D. At the point of evaluating the model.


a, b-----Which of the following are potential training data inadequacies that you should communicate to your users in support of transparency? (Select two.)

A. Any known bias in the sample data.
B. Any missing values in the dataset and how they were handled.
C. The relatively large size of a dataset used in training.
D. The amount of time it took to collect the data.


d-----Which of the following is a technique used by the Python tool Alibi to produce a subset of features that will usually result in the same model prediction?

A. Shapley value
B. Perturbation
C. Local Interpretable Model-Agnostic Explanations
D. Anchor Explanations


b-----Which of the following Python tools is designed to integrate with Google's Cloud AI platform?

A. LIME
B. What-If 
C. ELI5
D. SHAP


b, d-----Which of the following are typically true when comparing the LIME tool with the SHAP tool? (Select two.)

A. LIME supports more programming languages than SHAP.
B. LIME is less accurate than SHAP.
C. LIME supports fewer types of models than SHAP.
D. LIME outputs results faster than SHAP.


d-----Which of the following types of bias emerges when the same data is sampled over and over again, limiting a model's perspective?

A. Confirmation bias
B. Temporal bias
C. Implicit bias
D. Reinforcement bias


a-----Why is a model that has been overfitted to its training data a source of fairness risk?

A. Because the model won't generalize to the entire population.
B. Because the model includes too much noise.
C. Because the model is too complex.
D. Because the model has a temporal bias.


c-----Which type of edge case is caused by data outside the normal distribution?

A. Errors
B. Noise
C. Outliers 
D. Overfitting


a-----Which of the following is a function of exploratory data analysis (EDA)?

A. To evaluate the quality of data before it is used to train a model. 
B. To evaluate the organization's project management structure for the AI project.
C. To evaluate the methods used to collect the data.
D. To evaluate the decisions made by the model after training on the data.


c-----How can persona modeling be used to identify potential biases in a machine learning model?

A. The persona may show that specific users are a source of bias.
B. The persona may reveal overfitting issues in a model that result from bias.
C. The persona may represent groups of people that could be susceptible to bias. 
D. The persona may identify noise and other edge cases that lead to bias.


a-----In a classification model that determines whether or not a customer qualifies for a coupon, a significantly lower percentage of males qualified than females. Which of the following types of discrimination does this outcome potentially represent?

A. Disparate impact 
B. Disparate treatment
C. Disparate mistreatment
D. Disparate non-impact


c-----Which of the following describes the purpose of a STEEPV analysis?

A. To perform a strategic analysis of how internal office politics impact business operations.
B. To perform a strategic analysis of user needs and behaviors.
C. To perform a strategic analysis of how external environments impact business operations.
D. To perform a strategic analysis of how bias can manifest in AI products.


a, d-----Which of the following are best practices for incorporating inclusive design in AI projects? (Select two.)

A. Leverage customer input to reduce bias.
B. Keep machines and humans separate.
C. Solve for many, extend to one.
D. Consider bias a spectrum.


b-----Which of the following describes the AI Fairness 360 project?

A. A checklist for machine learning practitioners to follow when training fair AI models.
B. An open source library that evaluates models for bias and provides mitigation tactics to reduce that bias.
C. A global initiative that promotes fairness in AI through seminars, conferences, and other community-driven activities.
D. An AI product that represents a completely fair model for AI practitioners to use as a benchmark.


d-----What is the primary advantage of radioactive data tracing over past techniques that modify input in order to determine whether or not that input was used in training?

A. Radioactive data tracing can be used to modify the label.
B. Radioactive data tracing makes the modification perceptible to human beings.
C. Radioactive data tracing targets language-based input.
D. Radioactive data tracing doesn't impact a model's performance.


d-----What does the acronym SIEM stand for in a cybersecurity context?

A. Social, interpersonal, empathic, mental
B. Serial input to externalized modulation
C. Selective information extrapolation methods 
D. Security information and event management


a, b-----Which of the following sources does a SIEM system typically pull data from? (Select two.)

A. Network intrusion detection alerts 
B. System event logs 
C. Personnel emails
D. Encrypted personal data


c, d-----Which of the following are likely to be found within a penetration test rules of engagement (ROE)? (Select two.)

A. How long CCTV camera recordings should be maintained
B. The appropriate length and complexity of employee passwords
C. What methods of attack are legitimate 
D. What systems may be targeted


c-----Which team typically oversees penetration test operations and adherence to the rules of engagement (ROE)?

A. Purple team
B. Blue team
C. White team 
D. Red team


c, d-----Which of the following benefits can be gained from establishing baseline system behaviors? (Select two.)

A. Holding employees more accountable
B. Optimizing costs of operation
C. Restoring compromised functionality through a system rollback 
D. Tracking deviance from norms


d-----Which of the following could Nmap, Wireshark, or Metasploit be applied to for ethical purposes?

A. Business continuity planning
B. Persona modeling
C. Criminal exploitation
D. Attack simulations


d-----What does the initialism CIA stand for in a data security context?

A. Conformity, influence, adaptation
B. Communicability, interpretation, accessibility
C. Compliance, integrity, accountability
D. Confidentiality, integrity, availability


b-----SSL, TLS, and SSH are all forms of...

A. Version control systems
B. Encryption protocols 
C. Computer forensics tools
D. Media codecs


b-----What does the acronym CSIRT stand for in a security context?

A. Conformance strategy, immutability, reliability, trustworthiness
B. Cybersecurity incident response team 
C. Computer science, Internet, real-time interaction, technology
D. Computer security immediate readiness tools


d-----In which of the following could STRIDE or VAST classifications be applied?

A. Bias mitigation techniques
B. Black box mitigation methods
C. Network optimization tools
D. Threat modeling or analysis tools


c, d-----Why is it important to categorize ethical risks into different types? (Select two.)

A. It ensures that customers and other external stakeholders know that we take ethical risks seriously.
B. It helps us consider risk mitigation in terms of universal tactics that apply to all potential kinds of ethical risk.
C. It helps us understand the many complexities involved in different types of ethical risks. 
D. It makes it easier for us to identify and manage different types of risks.


a, c-----Which of the following communication tactics help uphold transparency and explainability from the customer perspective? (Select two.)

A. Providing prompt responses to customer questions about the decisions made by data-driven systems.
B. Providing in-depth white papers on the algorithms that underlie data-driven systems.
C. Providing information about data-driven systems in simple, easy-to-understand terms.
D. Providing guidelines for how customers can keep their private data secure when using data-driven systems.


b-----Why is it important to engage stakeholders at the beginning of the ethical risk management process?

A. It lets stakeholders know that the organization cannot address ethical risks in data-driven systems without input from stakeholders first.
B. It demonstrates that the organization is committed to accountability and transparency in their data-driven systems.
C. It helps the organization avoid legal trouble during the development and deployment of data-driven systems.
D. It proves that you are completely equipped to address any ethical risks in your data-driven systems.


c, d-----Which of the following situations would most likely require communication to external stakeholders? (Select two.)

A. The organization's change management strategy has been modified.
B. The organization plans to adopt a new ethical framework to support the implementation of an AI system.
C. The organization's AI product has a defect and needs to be recalled.
D. The organization's data-driven service will receive an update that enhances its accuracy.


a, b-----Which of the following are useful strategies for communicating ethical risks to the organization? (Select two.)

A. Communicate information in real time 
B. Disseminate information in multiple formats 
C. Communicate information through a single voice
D. Provide information only when solicited


a, c-----Which of the following are useful strategies for communicating ethical risks to society? (Select two.)

A. Be culturally sensitive and culturally aware during communication 
B. Limit the flow of information to one direction: organization to public
C. Ensure communication policies are diverse, inclusive, and equitable 
D. Provide access to information on a need-to-know basis


c-----When conducting a business impact assessment (BIA), why is it important to interview or survey personnel at the ground level, not just managers and other higher-ups?

A. They have a greater obligation to answer questions.
B. They are more likely to find the time to complete an interview or survey.
C. They may have more institutional knowledge about a subject than managers.
D. They are more likely to be candid and give forthright responses.


a-----As a result of failing to communicate ethical risks, the organization's reputation suffers and customers are less confident in the organization. What direct impact can this have?

A. The products or services the organization creates will have less of an impact in the marketplace.
B. Customers will find it more difficult to use your products and services.
C. Morale amongst internal personnel will drop, as will productivity.
D. The organization will be more likely to draw the attention of legal and regulatory auditors.


b-----Which of the following should be conducted as part of a risk communication strategy in order to ensure the organization is upholding its regulatory obligations?

A. Public relations campaign
B. Compliance audit 
C. Business impact assessment (BIA)
D. Ethical risk review


a, d-----Which of the following are useful strategies for communicating ethical risks to the individual? (Select two.)

A. Communicate to individuals proactively rather than reactively 
B. Inform individuals of how they are obligated to mitigate risks to themselves
C. Ensure individuals understand the specific details of each risk they are affected by
D. Ensure individuals feel that they have input into the process


c-----Which of the following is a best practice for incorporating diversity, equity, and inclusiveness in communication?

A. Focus on the organization's intended message rather than incorporating feedback from external stakeholders
B. Ensure multiple groups of people based on race, gender, etc., are communicating in different ways
C. Promote an organizational culture that embraces these values 
D. Reassure customers that the organization is diverse, equitable, and inclusive


b-----Which of the following is an important concept to consider as part of building an organizational philosophy?

A. Putting ethical principles into practice
B. Anticipating future implications of that philosophy 
C. Considering internal stakeholder needs above all else
D. Adopting philosophies already created by other organizations


a-----The endorsement of which of the following types of stakeholder is most critical when developing mission and vision statements?

A. Employees 
B. Customers
C. C-suite executives
D. Department heads


b-----Which of the following is a benefit of providing disclosure statements?

A. It demonstrates that the organization lacks ethical conflicts.
B. It demonstrates that the organization has a commitment to openness.
C. It enables the organization to mitigate ethical risks.
D. It creates an ethical framework from which the organization can operate.


d-----Which of the following is the most important factor to consider when developing corporate reports?

A. Who is the most qualified person to deliver the report
B. Whether or not it's necessary to include financial information in the report
C. Who the intended audience of the report is
D. Where the data used in the report comes from and how accurate it is


a, b-----Which of the following are important factors to consider when developing a media campaign? (Select two.)

A. The time-sensitive nature of communication in the campaign 
B. The environment in which the campaign will be launched 
C. The effect the campaign has on the organization's bottom line
D. The risks that will be talked about in the campaign


c, d-----Which of the following are distinguishing characteristics of a "living" public education campaign? (Select two.)

A. The campaign must be self-sustaining.
B. The campaign cannot be modified without the consent of the organization.
C. The campaign is continuously improved upon.
D. The campaign fosters a relationship between the organization and its stakeholders.


b-----Which of the following is a best practice when participating in media inquiries?

A. Divulge only the information that you are required to by law
B. Ensure your message is consistent 
C. Only agree to speak to media outlets that are favorable to your organization
D. Get your message out as quickly as possible


a-----What is the benefit of hosting a virtual reality press conference over a traditional in-person press conference?

A. The conference can be interactive without the participants needing to be co-located.
B. The conference will be easily accessible to all willing participants.
C. The participants will be impressed by your leveraging of new and exciting technologies.
D. It will be easier to communicate your overall message to your audience.


b, c-----Which of the following are important qualities of a press release? (Select two.)

A. It's non-interactive
B. It's in a digital format 
C. It's concise 
D. It's delivered on a single platform


c-----How does the low likelihood of a crisis relate to its potential impact?

A. A crisis with low likelihood tends to have low impact.
B. A crisis with low likelihood tends to have moderate impact.
C. A crisis with low likelihood tends to have high impact.
D. A crisis with low likelihood tends to have little to no effect on its impact.


c-----Which of the following is the most important idea that a crisis communication program should manage?

A. The individual details of a crisis
B. Internal stakeholder consensus about how to approach a crisis
C. The public's perception of a crisis 
D. The real-world effects of a crisis


a, b-----Which of the following are important to provide to a crisis communication team? (Select two.)

A. Clear direction on the roles and responsibilities of team members 
B. Access to adequate resources 
C. Permission to tell the public what they want to hear
D. The ability to work independently of the crisis management team


a, c-----Which of the following are desired qualities when choosing a spokesperson for your organization? (Select two.)

A. Articulate when communicating important details 
B. Lighthearted when dealing with serious topics
C. Patient when addressing tough questions or concerns 
D. Defensive when challenged with difficult situations


a-----The organization needs to ask itself about any quality control issues it may be having. Which of the following processes is most suitable for asking and answering that question?

A. Vulnerability audit 
B. Lessons learned report
C. Business continuity plan
D. Business impact assessment


b, d-----Which of the following practices can help an organization prepare to uphold business continuity in the event of a crisis? (Select two.)

A. Evaluating the effects that the crisis has on the business
B. Rehearsing business continuity tasks 
C. Informing external stakeholders of suspected incidents
D. Performing a business impact assessment (BIA)


c-----How can you leverage emerging technologies like AI in disaster recovery plans (DRP)?

A. By using natural language processing (NLP) techniques to ensure the DRP document is understandable and free of typographic errors.
B. By using AI decision-making systems to decide whether or not a DRP is necessary for your organization.
C. By using data-driven techniques to inform the strategies behind the DRP.
D. By using deep learning techniques to bolster the organization's defense against disasters.


c-----Which of the following is the first step in developing an incident response plan (IRP)?

A. Consulting internal stakeholders
B. Forming a team
C. Identifying risks 
D. Taking feedback from customers


c, d-----Which of the following activities are important to conduct in a post-crisis phase? (Select two.)

A. Restructuring the response team for future crises
B. Performing a vulnerability audit of all affected systems
C. Discussing lessons learned during the crisis 
D. Communicating information about the crisis with stakeholders


b, d-----Why is it important not to review a crisis too soon after it has concluded? (Select two.)

A. By reviewing a crisis too soon, you run the risk of violating compliance requirements.
B. By reviewing a crisis too soon, you may not have collected all of the useful details.
C. By reviewing a crisis too soon, you can unknowingly extend the effects of that crisis.
D. By reviewing a crisis too soon, you can exasperate the people involved.


c, d-----Which of the following are tools of an effective media communication plan? (Select two.)

A. Mission statement
B. Public education campaign
C. Press release 
D. Video briefing


b-----What is the purpose of a holding statement in crisis and media communications?

A. To order the business to temporarily halt certain operations
B. To pre-write communications before they are needed 
C. To prevent personnel from communicating prematurely
D. To retain the services of specific media outlets


a, c-----Which of the following are effective strategies when making statements on social media? (Select two.)

A. Being honest and up front 
B. Communicating only as needed
C. Presenting a face of the organization 
D. Focusing on positive feedback


c-----What is the primary purpose of obtaining feedback about an ethical crisis?

A. To appeases concerned stakeholders
B. To motivate internal personnel
C. To make operational improvements 
D. To demonstrate compliance


c-----Which of the following negative consequences is the direct result of failing to be truthful in communicating about a crisis?

A. Financial loss
B. Security risk
C. Reputational damage 
D. Discrimination


d-----When you deliver periodic statements about a crisis to the media, what should the first statement do?

A. Accept responsibility for perceived problems
B. Survey public opinion of the organization
C. Provide in-depth details about the situation
D. Set the tone of what is to follow


d-----Why is it important to build a "reservoir" of goodwill with the media?

A. The media will be less likely to publish a story about a crisis right away, opting to wait for your approval instead.
B. The media will be more likely to give the organization the benefit of the doubt in the event of a crisis.
C. The media will be more likely to advocate for your organization in the event of a crisis.
D. The media will be less likely to accuse the organization of being malicious or negligent in the event of a crisis.


d-----Why is it important to leverage legacy media like print, television, and radio, rather than just digital media?

A. It is easier to disseminate a message through legacy media channels
B. Legacy media channels are more effective at broadcasting a message
C. Digital media platforms are seen as less respectable or trustworthy
D. Not everyone has access to digital media platforms


c-----Which of the following is a useful strategy when communicating the truth about a crisis becomes difficult?

A. Promise to provide information at a later date
B. Provide information gradually, over multiple communications
C. Put all of the information out there at once 
D. Tell some truths, but withhold others


a-----How can sentiment analysis be useful in social media communication?

A. It can shape the content and delivery of the message based on users' perceptions of the organization or technology.
B. It can determine which users have the largest influence on your reputation, and therefore which users you should communicate with.
C. It can determine how to construct a message that influences users to be more positive about the organization or technology.
D. It can classify customers as loyal or disloyal, helping you target customers differently in your communications.


a-----Which of the following describes ethics washing?

A. Genuine ethical action gets replaced by superficial promises.
B. No attempt is made towards genuine ethical action.
C. Genuine ethical action is used to wash over previous mistakes.
D. Superficial promises are replaced by genuine ethical action.


b-----Is an open door policy equivalent to ensuring employee voice?

A. No, because an open door policy is the opposite of employee voice.
B. No, because an open door policy does not ensure employees feel heard.
C. Yes, because an open door policy is essential for employee voice.
D. Yes, because both allow employees to speak up.


c-----Which of the following might be a risk of not having an ethical organizational culture?

A. Employees are more likely to express their opinions about the company. 
B. Employees might be less interested in their careers.
C. Employees might face cognitive dissonance.
D. Employees will experience a faster approval process to get a product launched.


d-----Which expression best characterizes what a company or organizational culture is?

A. "This is how we want this done."
B. "It is what it is."
C. "This is what we're told to do."
D. "This is how things are done around here."


a-----Which of the following describes change management?

A. A collective term for all approaches to prepare, support, and help individuals, teams, and organizations in making organizational change.
B. A collective term used to describe how employees are able to voice their concerns to facilitate change in their organization.
C. A collective term for all approaches to prepare, support, and help individuals, teams, and organizations in fostering an ethical organizational culture.
D. A collective term used to explain how organizations facilitate change in a product after receiving negative feedback.


c-----Which organizational resource is most commonly used in terms of fostering an ethical organizational culture?

A. Physical resources
B. Informational resources
C. Human resources 
D. Financial resources


c-----Which of the following describes the purpose of having an Ethics Board for a data-driven organization?

A. An Ethics Board can help maintain an organization's values-based intentions and decrease the inherent dangers of autonomous technologies.
B. An Ethics Board can help maintain an organization's profit margins and increase transparency into how they increase their profits.
C. An Ethics Board can help maintain an organization's values-based intentions and increase transparency into how they use data-driven technologies.
D. An Ethics Board can increase transparency into how the organization uses AI or autonomous technologies.


b-----Which of the following is a potential benefit of having an ethical organizational culture?

A. The company will get an increase in stock value.
B. Employees will feel a sense of responsibility and loyalty.
C. More employees are likely to switch careers.
D. Employees are more likely to listen to their superiors.


a-----Which of the following describes employee voice?

A. The amount of voluntary effort employees are willing to put into communicating suggestions, opinions, concerns, and ideas that can be used to make improvements.
B. The amount of feedback that employees are willing to share with their fellow coworkers to boost company morale and efficiency.
C. The amount of voluntary effort that employees are willing to spend to file complaints about conditions of the company or organization. 
D. The likelihood of employees voicing their concerns about the company because they want to improve company performance.


b-----What is the purpose of ethics training in regard to fostering an ethical organizational culture?

A. To help employees develop their ability to follow instructions and identify potential avenues to improve efficiency and output.
B. To help employees develop their ability to recognize and promote ethical decisions in the workplace and identify ethical and unethical actions and behaviors.
C. To help employees develop their ability to communicate in the workplace and identify actions and behaviors that can help boost company morale.
D. To help employees develop their ability to identify potential misconduct in the workplace and report those incidents to the proper departments.


b-----Why is corporate governance important when thinking about ethical considerations for the development of data-driven technologies? 

A. It binds the employees in a moral code that limits the kind of actions they can engage in. 
B. It provides an accountability framework for stakeholders of the organization to prevent ethical violations.
C. It helps the organization showcase to its customers that it has ethical guidelines.
D. It helps the organization have a document to point towards in case an ethical violation occurs.


d-----Which of the following would be the most beneficial stage to hold ethical risk reviews for a new project that your team is undertaking?

A. Development
B. Design
C. Deployment
D. Conception


b-----Which of the following is NOT a common consideration when looking at the major ethical frameworks?

A. Privacy
B. Humanity 
C. Security
D. Transparency


a-----Which of the following is an ethical benefit of incorporating fair competition considerations in a data-driven technology ecosystem?

A. Encouraging product or service differentiation 
B. Lowering product and service costs for the users
C. Accelerating investments in research and development
D. Consolidating products and services under a single organization


b-----Which of the following principle sets are important for the creation of open data that is widely utilized?

A. ISO 27017
B. FAIR 
C. ISO 27001
D. FATE


d-----Which of the following is a misuse of intellectual property (IP) when it comes to ethical accountability for an organization?

A. Filing a patent for the IP that makes non-obvious information known to the public. 
B. Collecting returns on investments made in research and development. 
C. Enhancing the security posture of a product or service. 
D. Using IP as a defensive mechanism to eschew transparency requirements.


a, b-----Which of the following is an ethical risk if there is non-compliance with legal and regulatory requirements within a jurisdiction ? (Select two).

A. Lack of transparency 
B. User discrimination 
C. Reputational harm 
D. Loss of profits


a-----Which of the following best explains why there is an emphasis on including human rights in the major ethical frameworks? 

A. They are universal and provide scaffolding for all other ethical considerations.
B. They help to satisfy legal and regulatory requirements and make the product compliant in the local jurisdiction.
C. They help to provide an anthropocentric frame for the ethical considerations. 
D. They allow an organization to deliver its products and services in a larger number of markets.


d-----Why are environmental concerns important to consider in the ethical development of data-driven technologies?

A. Data-driven technologies directly impact living things via displacement.
B. Data-driven technologies directly impact the environment through the invasive mining of resources to create the technologies.
C. Data-driven technologies directly impact the environment through pollution.
D. Data-driven technologies can cause secondary, indirect, or cumulative effects on the environment that might impact people in the long term.


a-----Which of the following presents the most important argument for why we need to consider the impact of AI on labor in the design, development, and deployment of data-driven technology? 

A. There might be potential labor rights and human rights violations.
B. There may be an impact on worker productivity if they are not included in all phases.
C. The organization would like to avoid having to deal with union concerns.
D. There is still a need for human workers in human-in-the-loop mechanisms.


a-----To which of the following groups would a code of ethics not be applicable? 

A. Data subjects of the data-driven technology system 
B. Business managers of the data-driven technology system
C. Developers of the data-driven technology system 
D. Designers of the data-driven technology system


b-----Which of the following constitute internal stakeholders in the context of a code of ethics?

A. Regulators
B. Designers 
C. Data subjects
D. Policymakers


a-----Which of the following constitute external stakeholders in the context of a code of ethics?

A. Regulators 
B. Developers
C. Business managers
D. Designers


a, c, e-----How can you identify potential areas of concern for ethical practices when developing a code of ethics? (Select three).

A. Identify prior issues with your product or service.
B. Rely on the requirements of government regulations.
C. Research similar organization's ethical mistakes and concerns.
D. Rely on your own personal experiences.
E. Obtain feedback from stakeholder focus groups.


c, d-----Which of the following are possible causes of the limited adoption of a code of ethics within an organization? (Select two).

A. Prescriptive language used in the code of ethics
B. Comprehensive coverage of areas of concerns by the code of ethics
C. Lack of awareness of the code of ethics and where it is meant to be applied 
D. Lack of clarity in the code of ethics


c, d-----Which style or tone is recommended for a code of ethics? (Select two.)

A. Legal language
B. Subjective language
C. Plain language 
D. Prescriptive language


a-----Which of the following is a problematic reason to pilot a code of ethics prior to widespread deployment?

A. The pilot phase demonstrates the seriousness of the organization with respect to its ethical responsibilities. 
B. The pilot phase helps to stress test a code of ethics in a real-world situation.
C. The pilot phase helps to identify gaps in the current code of ethics. 
D. The pilot phase helps to develop awareness and buy-in from the relevant stakeholders in the organization.


c-----Which of the following is a reason to periodically update a code of ethics document? 

A. It reinforces the presence of the code of ethics in the minds of the employees.
B. It signals that you care about ethics to internal and external stakeholders. 
C. It allows you to capture the evolving nature of the ethical risks of the product or service that you are developing. 
D. It is a fiduciary and regulatory responsibility for the organization to do so.


b-----Which of the following will ensure that a code of ethics is widely adopted within the organization? 

A. Writing the code in legal language to ensure that it is compliant with the laws of the land.
B. Integrating the code of ethics deeply into the existing workflows within the organization.
C. Including the code of ethics in the legal documents signed by the employees.
D. Making a public announcement with the creators of the code of ethics.


a, d-----Which of the following are reasons to design, develop, and deploy a code of ethics within an organization? (Select two).

A. It compels employees to operate in an ethical and integral manner. 
B. It prevents regulatory scrutiny of the organization's practices.
C. It lets external stakeholders know that you are an ethical company. 
D. It creates consistency in the ethical practices across the organization, rather than patchy implementation of the practices.


a-----Which of the following helps to ensure that internal and external ethics policies are adhered to in practice?

A. Having unambiguous procedures tied to the clauses of the policy.
B. Including detailed legalese in the policy that mirrors regulatory requirements. 
C. Ensuring the policies have ample room for flexibility in implementation.
D. Developing procedures first and then creating policies that reflect those procedures.


c-----Which of the following is an important reason to have a policy owner for internal and external ethics policies ?

A. They can help to prevent changes from taking place in the policies over time by justifying their choices.
B. The policy owner will write the policy, relying solely on their personal institutional knowledge.
C. They can help to bring the right internal and external stakeholders together to help draft these ethics policies. 
D. It helps to have a single person that can be held accountable in case something goes wrong.


d-----Which of the following is a reason to engage in a comprehensive information gathering phase before drafting your internal and external ethics policies?

A. It helps to collect reaffirming evidence for your own ethical beliefs. 
B. It saves you effort if you just copy the existing ethics policies from other organizations.
C. It provides examples of possible ethical pitfalls that the organization should avoid.
D. It helps to unearth best practices from peers in the industry.


b-----Which of the following is a reason to engage external stakeholders during the development of internal and external ethics policies ? 

A. It can be used as an opportunity to demonstrate your ethical standpoints with both internal and external stakeholders. 
B. It can unearth new insights for how the products and services might be used in the target demographic community. 
C. It acts as a shielding mechanism for accountability in case an ethical violation occurs in the future.
D. It helps to reinforce the cultural and contextual values of the employees by getting external validation.


a-----Which of the following is an important action needed for the finalization of internal and external ethics policies before approval? 

A. Documenting the assumptions and choices made in the drafting of the policies 
B. Testing the policy in an already deployed project setting
C. Discarding open issues to provide a clean slate for the next iteration of the policies 
D. Ensuring the policies are the same as those from other peer organizations


a-----Which of the following is an essential asset that helps to operationalize the internal and external ethics policies via procedures? 

A. Concrete examples that show how the policies work in practice. 
B. A detailed report that presents the various scenarios using technical jargon.
C. A description of the procedures in the annual report of the organization.
D. A designated ethics lead who is solely responsible for the implementation of said procedures.


a-----Which of the following is a key element of communications with internal and external stakeholders regarding an organization's ethics policies?

A. Simple to follow examples 
B. Dense procedural descriptions 
C. Daily communications
D. Flexible verbiage


b-----Which of the following is an important reason for continually refreshing an organization's internal and external ethics policies?

A. It helps demonstrate to senior management that work is being done on the internal and external ethics policies. 
B. It helps maintain alignment with the emergent risks and changing ethical posture of the products and services of the organization. 
C. It helps internal stakeholders justify the release of new product features or service upgrades.
D. It helps maintain alignment of the policies with the cultural and contextual values of the organization's employees.


a-----Which of the following is a benefit of using focus groups over surveys? 

A. They allow for deeper engagement with the target demographic community. 
B. They are a more scalable option for the collection of information.
C. They can provide more data through structured information gathering. 
D. They are an easier way to collect information from a target audience.


a-----Which of the following is a valid reason for tracking the number and severity of an organization's ethical violations?

A. It can help provide transparency around the efforts to improve the policies. 
B. It can help provide qualitative information that can be used to improve the policies. 
C. It can dissuade end users from scrutinizing the internal and external ethics policies. 
D. It can replace the need for refreshing the internal and external ethics policies.


d-----Based upon studies from conducted by accredited certification bodies and the Lumina Foundation, which of the following is true regarding professionals who hold industry validated certifications?

A. They are more likely to be employed by enterprise level organizations. 
B. They demonstrate higher productivity than peers without professional certifications. 
C. They are statistically shown to have greater intelligence than their peers without professional certifications. 
D. They have greater potential to earn higher salaries than peers without professional certifications.


a-----When scheduling your exam on Pearson VUE, you will be asked to provide information about yourself. Which of the following do you need to be sure to do when entering this information? 

A. Match the government-issued ID that you will use to verify your identity on the day of the exam. 
B. Run the speed the test prior to entering your information. 
C. Set up a unique email to receive exam information from Pearson VUE. 
D. Have your video camera on and set to the correct aspect ratio.


d-----Which of the following is a noted difference between a certificate and a certification? 

A. Certifications can be accredited. 
B. Certifications cannot be revoked.
C. Certifications are granted upon completion of a course. 
D. Certifications are issued by industry certification bodies.


a, b, c-----Which of the following tools can be used to prepare for a certification exam?

A. Summative assessments in Coursera preparatory course.
B. Instructor-led or self-paced courses in the exam domains. 
C. The domain domains and objectives in the exam blueprint.


a-----Which of the following are included in an exam blueprint?

A. The length of the exam 
B. Time and date of your exam
C. How to schedule your exam
D. Practice questions


a-----Upon successful completion of your exam, which of the following actions can you take to share your certification with employers and peers?

A. Post your Accredible-issued badge on social platforms such as LinkedIn.
B. Display your Coursera Professional Certificate on social platforms such as LinkedIn.
C. Share a screenshot from the end of the exam showing that you passed. 
D. Forward the email notification from Pearson VUE that you receive upon passing the exam to your employer.


b-----You have scheduled your exam at a Pearson VUE test center. Which of the following should you do before you leave for your appointment at the test center?

A. Make sure you have your mobile phone to take photos of the exam room to provide to the proctor.
B. Check that you have the government-issued ID that you used during registration.
C. Verify that you have run the speed test on the computer that you plan to take the exam on.
D. Pack snacks and drinks to have during the exam.


c-----Which of the following are included in the CertNexus Candidate Agreement?

A. Instructions on how to schedule your exam
B. Domains and objectives covered in the exam
C. Expectations of personal conduct such as cheating 
D. List of subject matter experts that contributed to the job task analysis


b-----Reviewing the exam blueprint prior to scheduling your exam will allow candidates to do which of the following? 

A. Practice the skills required to complete the tasks outlined in the objectives. 
B. Consider whether you possess the knowledge, skills, and abilities required to successfully pass the exam.
C. Practice exam items that reflect the questions on the certification exam. 
D. Consider whether you have the required degree or licensure to successfully pass the exam.


d-----Which of the following is an easy and accessible way to demonstrate your skills alongside your certification? 

A. Post the link to your Accredible badge on global vendor-neutral blogs
B. Post a video on social media discussing the value of certifications
C. Post on social platforms about how proficient you are in the subject area 
D. Post evidence of your accomplishments on your Accredible profile